Back on topic, this fabric features little golf icons. I totally need to go miniture golfing this. It was thrifted, and I think it might be from the '60s since it since it says it's copyright "Custom Fabrics Inc. 1966." I made sure to include that on the hem, even if it's upside down.
With the trapeze girls huddled by their door and the table-dancers by theirs the street looks like a cigarette film still of overpainted, underfed dramatic misery. I am struck by a fear that this is what will bring the snow.
I popped back to Reer Ritz and purchased more of this cracking beverage. Hazy orange, heady fruit, greenly herbal, hedgy nose, mouth coating mega complex balance of citric, herbal and bitingly bitter hops and really solid, quite sweet & smooth malt core. The great, great thing about this beer is that it's VERY complex but VERY well balanced. The key? Blending two beers.
U.S. officials were also quick to express their “deep sadness” as they described the “individual act” as an “isolated episode.” Lt. Gen. Adrian J. Bradshaw, deputy commander of the international coalition in Afghanistan, called the murders “callous.” Secretary of Defense Leon Panetta told Afghan president Hamid Karzai, “I condemn such violence and am shocked and saddened that a U.S. service member is alleged to be involved.” U.S. President Barack Obama declared, “I offer my condolences to the families and loved ones of those who lost their lives, and to the people of Afghanistan, who have endured too much violence and suffering. This incident…does not represent the exceptional character of our military and the respect that the United States has for the people of Afghanistan.”
So I went to bed.
The park. That was the nice place with the trees. I like that. But the car… I don’t like that part.
The old Barack Obama will be back, I believe, but it won't be until November 7, 2012. I believe his second term will be launched with a progressive agenda that Democrats and progressives will be very happy about; we just need to hold out, and make sure to get the president re-elected. It's frustrating that politics stand in the way of a president governing in his first term, but that's unfortunately the reality of every president for a as long as anyone alive can remember. So, Democrats and progressives will be disappointed for the next couple of years, but I think we'll be much more disappointed if we don't re-elect President Obama, who will be our bastion of progressive politics in his second term.
We don't have big plans for the weekend. I WILL be replacing the valve on our ice maker and cleaning the dryer. It is time to delint the dryer so we don't have to worry about a dryer fire.
I wrote this post last week, but didn’t post because of all the criticism for this cause. According to some people the cause has been overhyped, and there are better causes out there. But I’m posting this anyway. It’s something worth fight for in the end. It is happening, whether or not the scale has been exaggerated.
I often make the point that I hope for more from my sponsors than just their financial support. The best of them bring me lively and informed discussion and information from the front line, whether in the formal meetings and events which they organise or in bars around the world; I had an extended conversation about predictive coding with James Moeskops recently which began at a Nuix party overlooking Sydney Harbour and ended a few weeks later in a Munich hotel bar. One of the attractions, indeed, of foreign conferences is the opportunity to speak properly with London-based people whom I may rarely see on home turf.
I became curiously caught up in the attempt to deny Cowell his automatic Christmas No.1, and the cheer that went up from this house that Sunday night echoed across the valley and sent the dog under the sofa. Childish really, but as it seemed increasingly unlikely that we could succeed, I began to feel that not failing was more important than succeeding. It would be absurd to place too much significance on what was essentially a light-hearted exercise, even if there was a serious underlying message about corporate manipulation of the music industry and its impact on original, independent artists. But I suspect that the success of a grassroots Internet campaign to overturn a £50 million media machine, against all expectation, may not have gone unnoticed in government circles here and overseas. Any failure might equally have been noted.
Yesterday was a long day for me which ended with a band rehearsal and more work. By the time I wrapped all up my day, I was out of time and out of steam to get in my Yoga workout. So, I am pushing it until later in the calendar. If you’re keeping score at home, I now owe 1 X Stretch workout and 1 Yoga X workout. I will make those up along the way.
Sighing heavily, Frankie looked at his friend. "So all those years of poverty. The fasting. The preaching and the sacrifices. Apparently I didn't have to be all in. I only needed to give 67%."
______
is very lush green countryside,
We were sad to go, but anxious for our next adventure in Utah. Yes, I flew from CA to UT for the weekend so I could attend my cousin's wedding and spend Conference Weekend with family. A very pleasant surprise was that Greg, Jayson's brother, was on the same flight! He was brave enough to sit by us and ended up loving baby Sophie the entire flight. (which was a much needed break for her tired mamma)
- I do have to give myself props for learning 180 student names in the first two weeks. Don't even ask me to tell you their last names, but I can at least call on them when they fall asleep during a video or give them a fist bump in the hallway.
- Three-color distinctive leather
2. Dried Apple
In Hebrews 11:1 we have a perfect definition of faith.
And now, I need a good hot shower and giving my scalp a good massage.
While the Lindsay administration had made certain half-hearted attempts at so-called Times Square cleanup, these efforts were largely ineffective. Landlords could make significant short term profits by renting for pornographic purposes, and the Colombo crime family which reportedly controlled significant pornography distribution was flush with money having allegedly made huge profits on the distribution of such films as “Deep Throat” and the Devil in Miss Jones. On the other hand, for the Hell’s Kitchen resident not employed in such activities, the spread of pornography and prostitution represented a significant threat. The theater district, which was a major source of employment, was rapidly losing business, and their ability to walk the streets safely was compromised by the proliferation of prostitutes. To the old line Irish and other residents represented by the McManus Club something had to be done, but with fairly liberal Supreme Court decisions and “porno chic” in essence protecting pornography, the question was what.
Acts 19:6-7 – When Paul placed his hands on them, the Holy Spirit came on them, and they spoke in tongues and prophesied. There were about twelve men in all.
“That sounds like a line from one of your poems! Is it?” Charles asked warily.
"Who can tell what counts as death for them?" Rissad's scowl went distant for a moment, then came back stronger. "You're on their side, now?"
Suggestion: We should start looking in Santa Marta, Colombia, for his footprints!
But while the singer was toasting the performance with all of her showbiz friends at a party after Britain’s Got Talent, the claws were coming out on social networking sites.
This pretty much sums up my weekend.
The greater problem, in terms of numbers and spread of readers, is The New Statesman’s promulgation of these vile assertions. Bradford gets two types of press from the national media: bad and none. And now, in a truly mixed constituency which has consistently chosen to ignore race and religion, we are being accused of being racist and religiously fanatical. London, piss off! We don’t want what you’re selling. You know our stereotype, you come here (once in a blue moon) and see what you want to see, take your ‘proof’ home and peddle it back to us. In this instance, though, there was no proof: the assertions of voter racism are from the pen of Khan’s pen and imagination rather than the lips (and certainly not the actions) of Bradford West’s voters…
I’m not going to hide behind jokes and sarcasm (well, actually I probably will do that)
and lucky for us, life does supply it
We open by seeing Britten's love-hate relationship with Los Angeles, which we see represented by smoggy skies, bumper-to-bumper traffic, and a homeless guy living under a bridge. While jogging, Britten encounters a woman walking a yappy little dog, who lunges at him. The dog's owner chews Britten out for "scaring" the little monster. A homeless man offers to sell Britten a box of junk for ten dollars; when Britten declines, the man asks for a dollar on general principles. Britten then intervenes in an increasingly violent argument by two drivers whose cars have collided, while muttering, "Stupid city." We then see Britten on the phone with Hannah, who is walking through a college campus in Portland, Oregon, and can't say enough nice things about it.
Fear of the truth was clearly in play at a Jan. 14 meeting of the Federal Interagency Autism Advisory Committee (IACC) when the Committee took a convenient "re-vote" to nullify a previous vote to use a portion of congressionally appropriated funds in the Combating Autism Act of 2006 to investigate the long reported association between vaccination and autism. Whether the "re-vote" can be blamed on a turf war between federal agencies, a Committee member who defied direction given to her by her employer, Autism Speaks, or a desperate, last minute end-run by health officials to again delay the day when the truth about vaccine risks is known, it is the people who always lose in this high stakes game of denials and delays.
Last year, in the build-up to Bersih 2.0, the situation was tense: there were numerous reports of government threats and warnings, of weapons found, of people clad in yellow T-shirt arrested. Even the King himself stepped in at one stage.
All of that said, I have done VERY well. I was, most definitly, and without realizing it, addicted! But the longer I go without it, the less appealing it is. However, I recently told Erik that when I go to Heaven, I am going to ask for LOTS and LOTS of ice cream. Because I miss it that much!!
The other task I took care of today is I took apart the large clay head that I had been using so that I could transition to a relief format for the next few pieces.
Levesque’s contract with IQ-ity raises questions about Bush’s foundation work. As Mother Jones recently reported, the founder of IQ-ity, William Lager, also founded an education company with a poor track record. Lager’s other education firm, Electronic Classroom of Tomorrow, is the largest provider of virtual schools in Ohio. ECOT schools have consistently underperformed; though the company serves more than 10,000 children, its graduation rate has never broken 40 percent. The company was fined for billing the state to serve more than 2,000 students in one month, when only seven children logged on during the same time period. Nevertheless, after Levesque spent at least two years as a registered lobbyist for Lager’s firm, Bush traveled to Ohio to give the commencement speech for ECOT. “ECOT proves a glimpse into what’s possible,” Bush said with pride, “by harnessing the power of technology.”
"In an attempt to make them more compliant, they have been quietly threatened with false charges by corrupt police officials.
If your perception of the freedom of speech means you think you can say anything you like, no matter who it offends, regardless of the consequences and at the risk of alienating people en masse, based on ignorance, vitriol and the moral compass of Nero, then you need counselling. Read your history books or, if words are too hard beyond a paragraph or three, try Google and type in HITLER. The pictures tell the story. If you still aren’t convinced, watch any Jerry Springer re-run to see how your intellectual future will pan out.
Festive red table cloth on table
Third of all, how do you spell “kooka”?
loosening up of the past three years, the Brits flinch from the sheer expanse of the Pink Dots and their ilk.
Vic Venturi, whose name derives from the 1964 US Open golf winner Ken Venturi, made his racing debut in a point-to-point at Tinahely on February 20, 2005. Initially in the care of trainer Philip Fenton, he made his debut under Rules a month later when runner-up in a Fairyhouse bumper. He returned to action that October at Galway for a first start over hurdles and won the two and a quarter mile contest under Barry Geraghty. That 2005/2006 campaign saw him emerge as a high-class novice. Victories in the Grade Three Dorans Pride Novice Hurdle and the Grade Two Festival Novice Hurdle at Fairyhouse were backed up by placed efforts in good company, including when third to Nicanor in the Grade One Champion Novice Hurdle at Punchestown that April. Vic Venturi returned to Galway to kick-off the 2006/2007 season and landed the spoils in the Grade Three Ballybrit Novices’ Chase over two miles and a furlong. His novice chase campaign followed a similar pattern to his season as a novice hurdler with some high-class efforts, including when runner-up to Mister Top Notch in the Grade One Dr P J Moriarty Novice Chase at Leopardstown in February, 2007. His form tailed off thereafter as he finished fifth in the Jewson Novices’ Handicap Chase at the Cheltenham Festival and was pulled up at Punchestown in April. A lacklustre start to the 2007/08 season resulted in owner Seamus Dunne transferring Vic Venturi to Edward O’Grady’s stables following a fifth place finish in the Grade Two Bobbyjo Chase at Fairyhouse that February. There were only fleeting glimmers of his former spark until his final outing that term when runner-up to Emma Jane in the Pat Taaffe Handicap Chase at the Punchestown Festival. Vic Venturi joined trainer Dessie Hughes ahead of the 2008/09 season but again seemed a touch below par. He failed to win during the campaign, taking his losing streak to 20 races. However, he did run a respectable race in the Irish Grand National and the last of those efforts saw him clinch the runner-up berth for the second successive year in the Pat Taaffe Handicap Chase, when conceding 9lb to the talented Ambobo. That race marked the first and only time to date that Vic Venturi has worn blinkers. Cheek pieces were in place when he made his seasonal return in the Wilderness Chase at Clonmel in October, 2009, three years to the day after his previous win. Vic Venturi showed resolution as he stayed on to defeat Rathmore Castle by six lengths in the two and a half mile contest on soft ground. Carrying top-weight in the totesport.com Becher Chase over three and a quarter miles of the Grand National fences at Aintree in November, 2009, the Old Vic gelding saw off Keenan’s Future by five lengths. Vic Venturi contested the Grade Two woodiesdiy.com Christmas Hurdle over three miles at Leopardstown the following month and finished a fair fifth to Powerstation before trailing home down the field in a handicap hurdle over the same course and distance on January 23. Vic Venturi returned to fences for the Grade Two Bobbyjo Chase at Fairyhouse in February, 2010 and won well on the soft ground, beating stablemate Black Apalachi by eight lengths. He was sent off a 25/1 chance for the 2010 John Smith’s Grand National and was still very much in contention when unseating Roger Loughran at the 20th fence. Vic Venturi started last season at the deep end as he came home a well beaten seventh in the Grade One Lexus Chase at Leopardstown on December 28 and he filled the same spot over the smaller obstacles in the Grade Three Limestone Lad Hurdle at Naas on January 15. He made his second successive appearance in the Grade Two Bobbyjo Chase at Fairyhouse on February 23 but could not repeat the heroics of 12 months earlier and kept on at the same pace to take fourth behind The Midnight Club. He warmed up for last year’s John Smith’s Grand National in a three and a quarter mile chase at Down Royal on March 17, and once again finished fourth, this time behind Hold The Pin. In the 2011 renewal of the John Smith’s Grand National at Aintree, he got no further than the second fence, where he was brought down, but finished his campaign with a solid second in the Grade One Punchestown Guinness Gold Cup. He started this campaign in two point-to-points in January, winning at Kilfeacle on the 15th and at Ballinaboola on the 29th. He then went to Leopardstown for the Raymond Smith Memorial Hunters’ Chase on February 12 and, despite being well fancied, he could only finish 12th of the 17 runners behind Salsify. Race Record: Starts: 41; Wins: 7; 2nd: 9; 3rd: 2; Win & Place Prize Money: £287,529
First the Bad News… Then the Good
I'd have fun with my friends, cover emotions with laughter and being the funny girl! And you better believe I am pretty funny...Ha! I'd come home, eat like crazy, feel HORRIBLE and most likely, cry myself to sleep and I'd repeat the same thing in my mind, "Tomorrow I'll start". "I'll wake up and start a new day, a new diet".
Look at Gus's legs! Good gracious. Any bets on height?
Enna Burning by Shannon Hale
Let me set the scene up for you:
For many women, dread turns to panic around 4:00 in the afternoon. That’s when they have to answer that age-old question, “What’s for dinner?” Many resort to another supermarket rotisserie chicken or—worse yet—ordering dinner through a drive-thru intercom.
3. Kris Allen – “The Vision Of Love” The most interesting thing about that performance was the rotating piano platform in the middle of the stage. Come on, Kris, Adam Lambert had no problem hitting those high notes and he lost to you. WHY CAN’T YOU HIT THOSE NOTES? What a waste!
Since i bought my tripod like 4 years ago, I have used it only as a support for not putting the camera on the ground or as a light stand, but for what it was actually design, not much use it has seen… Its a Manfrotto 190XPROB with 488RC2 Ball Head, quite robust and sturdy, but really heavy. So it usually stays at home. Today I decided take it for a ride. I used the D700 with a 20mm and played with long exposures. Results came out better then expected, hope to do it once more and this time to bring an external flash plusa friend to be able to freeze the people on the street a bit better.
These are ready to order as prints if interested please click on the top image or here to order. All purchases help me on my photographic journey and are much appreciated. Please like me on Facebook, I need more views to get listed in the search area as well! Keep shooting.
An innovative seating system
I have been feeling sorry for myself for a while.
Hold, darkness - birth me a passionate wind!
lose the 12 pounds I've gained. HEIFER!!
#2) Knocking your enemies onto a ledge that is ABOVE you. Not so good.
Sit back relax in chair or sofa or lie down in the bed in a comfortable position without any strain on the body.
6How much less man who is an insect, and the son of man who is a worm!
Author Summary: The narrow-sense heritability of a trait such as body-mass index is a measure of the variability of the trait between people that is accounted for by their additive genetic differences. Knowledge of these genetic differences provides insight into biological mechanisms and hence treatments for diseases. Genome-wide association studies (GWAS) survey a large set of genetic markers common to the population. They have identified several single markers that are associated with traits and diseases. However, these markers do not seem to account for all of the known narrow-sense heritability. Here we used a recently developed model to quantify the genetic information contained in GWAS for single traits and shared between traits. We specifically investigated metabolic syndrome traits that are associated with type 2 diabetes and heart disease, and we found that for the majority of these traits much of the previously unaccounted for heritability is contained within common markers surveyed in GWAS. We also computed the genetic correlation between traits, which is a measure of the genetic components shared by traits. We found that the genetic correlation between these traits could be predicted from their phenotypic correlation.
This week, I had dinner with my old coworkers and as we went around the table trading tales of our new positions, I found myself weighing the pros and cons of my current situation and my previous one.
Her theme included a post signature that also serves as post divider, blog button, post stickers for her reviews, "In my mailbox" posts, interviews, giveaways and guest posts, a fairy-wings rating system, a secondary menu, and social media icons. I'm really, really happy with how the sidebars came out, and the post signature thing and post stickers. I'm also really happy about how the header turned out, and after seeing the end result, I must say Bree was very well inspired to give me this direction for it.
You may have read on some of my earlier posts, I am a diagnosed, text-book case, Hypervigilant Person. It was caused from childhood trauma I had experienced, and was a symptom of PTSD.
in case grand baby #2 decides to come early,
There was no crowd there, the Devi was beautiful and the priest was busy so I could not ask to take pictures of the Devi.. but the katte is aweome. Its a nice place for a sit down and a think and a chat. I met a lovely young mother called Jyothi who was a delight to talk to.
and other
*Quaker Oatmeal Squares Cereal Sample
Davies denounced criticism that the new commission would be CIPRO - just under a new name. "Our intention is to actually ease processes so it won't be business as usual. We are aware that there will be challenges at first but what we can assure businesspeople is that things will be totally different from now on."
04 - Gator Country 07:08
She: Will you hit me?
The conservative majority were in fact ingenious in their intervention, the implications of which will take quite a while to tell. They also conceal a potential for real change. For so many political debates in our country get mired in the surface details. But the debate that will now occur over the relation between corporations and politics will redefine precisely what gets to count as politics in this country.
- Everyone in Rome wears puffa jackets. Everyone. Some of the men wear discreet navy options, and some wear terrifying PVC abominations with shiny jeans. Some of the girls wear short casual versions, and others wear snow-bunny style knee-length fitted puffa coats. Inflation is alive and well in Roma. If I lived in Rome, I would not succumb to this trend. I will never clad myself in balloons.
?Germ Defense antimicrobial protection in water tank creates a germ free mist?
one who would only take blood from the toes,
To illustrate the point of the “bounce” theory, look at the next starts of major league pitchers who have thrown no-hitters. Invariably, their next starts are fair to poor. Just this week, Chicago White Sox pitcher Philip Humber, who hurled a perfect game in his last start against Seattle, faced the Red Sox at home and gave up 9 runs in five innings in a 10-3 loss on Thursday night.
be cocaine — was found in the
permission during the process of installing this package.
I love the delicate and feminine look of the cream.
He would go on to become England’s caretaker manager in between the end of the Ramsey era and beginning of the Revie debacle.
Put peel in a saucepan filled with cold water and bring to boil over moderate heat. Boil for a minute or two and drain. Repeat procedure 4 times to remove bitterness.
If you haven't tried it yet, I'd move quickly ... this might not be around for long.
Flowers : Sweet Taffy Pink, Sweet Taffy Brown, Love Letter Roses Quartz, Arcodian Collection Weathered, Orchard Mix Blushing Picnic, Angelica Rose Col Bonnie - All by Prima Marketing
I know I am unique in loving to cook. I know I now have the time to do so. But, I used to “pee” away how much time with a beeper at restaurants waiting for a table. I think I prefer spending that time cooking, and not roaming around being bored and paying ridiculous prices for a beer or glass of wine while waiting for a table in the chain restaurants in Columbia.
Inner Peace! by Vanessa Hughes
I smoke.
Also, Jeri Ryan is one of the coolest people on Twitter. You should send her pictures of your cat.
* My tomatoes stayed cool enough to produce all summer even when the temp reached 100 and above. They never even withered.
Not quite. I’d say two things of my life – and again, this is backed by experience and research. First is a sense of utter loss and frustration. Living as male for so many years has felt, continues to feel, a complete waste. As though I was living in a foreign land and never learned the language.
The Titanic was one of the first ships in history to issue an SOS. (“Send S.O.S.,” the twenty-two-year-old Harold Bride, the Titanic’s junior wireless operator, who survived, told the twenty-five-year-old Jack Phillips, the senior officer, who died. “It’s the new call, and it may be your last chance to send it.”) And the sinking was among the first global news stories to be reported, thanks to wireless radio, more or less simultaneously with the events. One of the early headlines, which appeared as the rescue ship carried survivors to New York—“WATCHERS ANGERED BY CARPATHIA’S SILENCE”—suggests how fast we became accustomed to an accelerating news cycle. The book winningly portrays the wireless boys of a hundred years ago as the computer geeks of their day, from their extreme youth to their strikingly familiar lingo. “WHAT IS THE MATTER WITH U?,” came one response to the Titanic’s distress call. The article also examines themes of class and privilege, hubris, and heroism.
frozen
Rose has a mandatory Bible study every morning at 10:30. The whole world stops and whoever is around has no choice but to participate Recently French and I were ice-fishing with Bruce Fish and it was 10:30. Out comes her wretched looking Bible. We weren't paying enough attention so she handed it to French to read the day's passage. Usually he can't even find his Bible, but he stopped what he was doing and read aloud. Rose looked well pleased.
I’ve run my brain over this a million times, and I want to post it here – partially to get my thoughts in order, and partially to see if anyone has any effing clue as to what I could be doing about this.
Patsy was recently invited to record a song for a compilation album of Bob
Mini Caramel Apples
Amy explains that The Thrifty Chicks’ goal--to create a more robust reuse market--is heavily rooted in a desire to lighten the impact that the American new product market has on the environment. “Our current shopping behaviour costs a lot more than the price tag we see. It carries a heavy carbon footprint that no one’s fully deciphered. We know the calories in one stinkin’ pickle because the FDA regulates food labeling. But we’ve no idea the cost of manufacturing and shipping of a new pair of blue jeans made in China across the world to the U.S.,” Amy says. “The carbon footprint of our shopping is undeniably large and it continues to grow, even during a devastating recession. This makes no sense. Product reuse can significantly help lower the flow of cheap, new, energy intensive goods into the country.”
Two masked men came in , showed a gun and robbed the place.
But see, this pool can only hold so much. So when it hits a breaking point, I'm showered down upon with all kinds of winnings. Of course, once it's gone, it's gone so I have no more luck until the pool fills back up. Maybe that's a karma thing, but I'll have to think further before I postulate on that one.
On the opposite side of the coin are farmers where one farmer pays 300 złoty every three months for everything: health insurance and pension. So I pay for a second unusable bed in hospital nearly the same amount as a farmer pays in three months for all his social care. If this meant that I had superior treatment by the health service, then all very well. Alas, I don't!
Entire contents of external hard drives (that are the only source of all my recent travel photos) get deleted
Kind of a heady subject for a Saturday night, but I’ve been reading about new data released by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control (CDC) showing measles in the U.S. quadrupled in 2011. Recent outbreaks of pertussis, or whooping cough, in Montana, Utah, Washington, and Wisconsin show just how vulnerable the population is to these, and other infectious diseases. It’s an even bigger problem in Western Europe, with over 30,000 cases per year.
EPILOGUE: The requisite Semon set piece on towers with the acrobatic swinging of stunt men. Semon’s character jumps onto an airplane just as the tower he is on is smashed by a cannon—this would go in ANY action film today. Back to the little girl’s dream. End.
I’ve actually ordered in the last 3 months, 110 boxes of chocolates and I’m now down to the last 10 – so call me If you want to buy some.
You may be hearing more about this book in the future: In googling around for a book cover image, I discovered reports that it’s being made/has been made? into a movie … starring the reclusive Joaquin Phoenix as Edgar Allan Poe.
Oh, and I did a session on our 24 Hours in Photos project, which was neat and I’m happy people responded positively to it. But the real news was learning about the amount of passion out there in social media just waiting to connect, and what awesome things are possible when it happens.
I can still watch the RCA Dome, Peyton, the crowd, Monument Circle at game time, and put myself there. I realize how much that team means to the city, and what it was like when it seemed that they might leave for L.A. (Oh, and I remember my thoughts about them coming there from Baltimore, which happened well before I was a resident, but that's a different discussion.)
Makes better sense for the title, that way.
I. Let me show you what the apostle Paul did not glory in.
Mr Sheridan asked whether the NotW was a newspaper that regarded itself as being above the law and that could make payments to people to remain quiet about illegal activities. Mr Wight responded that he was not aware of any payment for illegal activities.
Some libraries have video games, free access to Ancestry.com, free internet access, reading contests, and book clubs. My library even puts you on a list for automatic holds for your favorite author’s new books. So dust off your old library card today!
Our little family! I can't believe how little the girls were. : ( They grow up soo fast! Miss E will be 14 this summer and Miss A is 6.
Little FuFu and his Mexican Friends
For many black people, it took a long time before they were willing to step inside the larger Evanston Y.M.C.A., now known as the McGaw Y.M.C.A.
This one is surprisingly my absolute favorite of them all, I love the color and the application, even though what I had really been lemming was the BarryM Racing Green...I think that color will look better on my toes this summer than on my hands this winter. =/
The rights: I did finally “get it” so next time they will be treated with the care they deserve.
So much for being sentimental, ha ha.
Take-out Delivery
A quick hit here since I didn't take good notes. The Xiao Long Bao were good but not stellar. The pork chop noodle soup was good, but no match for the heavenly version served at Qing Dao Bread Food.
Cameron responded with a ringing endorsement for his host, ticking off the President's achievements in his response toast.
“To the majority of people the words “Crown” and “City” in reference to London refer to the queen or the capital of England.
He nodded. "I'll take it nice and slow on the way back," he said.
15. Fox On The Run - 4:00
I'm sure by now, you're well aware that I am a fan of old chippy, rusty stools.
When the bull has run around a bit and the crowd has had a good look at him, the rejoneadores (horse-mounted fighters) are let into the arena. The horses are heavily padded, this is because the bull charges the horse, and on more than one occasion topples the horse. The rejoneadore draws first blood, and sticks a long lance into the bull's shoulders. This is their sole purpose, and they then leave the arena.
I want you think just for a second that you were one of those kids. 10 years old, maybe younger, and someone put a gun in your hand, aimed at your mother’s head, and asked you to shoot. You have no choice but to do as they say. You are completely, utterly helpless. Does the thought make you cry? Wouldn’t you wish that there was someone who could help you?
Am I going through a dormant stage like all the trees outside? They are performing spectacular costume changes. It's really quite something to see, especially from the swing set in the park where you can swing so high that you actually get nauseous. Trust me.
Our attempt at order by compartmentalizing or controlling our lives, people, and tasks is really a heart issue. We have to ask ourselves what we believe. Do we believe that God is Lord over all, attentive to us in everything?
And if you’re still in doubt, don’t freeze up—just pick an approach and start writing. Remember, you can always change it later if you need to.
Hello everyone!!! I'm very proud to be the Guest DT at The Official Magnolia Inspiration Challenge (TOMIC) this week. I made Top 5 and was invited to join the very talented DT members to create a project inspired by "CHOCOLATE". I'm so lucky! What theme could be better than this, right? Well, the very first thing that comes to my mind when I think of Chocolate is a big slice of Chocolate Cake.... MMMmmm! my favorite. I hope you enjoy the chocolate cake I'm sharing with you today along with my Recipe for Love card holder!
So right now, to keep my fingers fleet and my Muse accountable, I'm gonna note the time I finish jotting down this post. Within 60 seconds of clicking "publish," I'm going to open my MS. Tackle chapters 25 & 26 - overwriting, weak motivation, missing facts and repeated words be damned. Then I'm going to report back in within an hour. Timed writing, y'all. Timed writing.
Trapped in a ball of fire and your love overflowed my soul,
Also, I am not sure how I fell into the job of crowd control, but I had to keep people back from her stage, and keep the aisle clear.
Somewhere within
With two weeks worth of entries to enjoy, there was no way I could pick just one Spotlight winner, so Abi and Fi have let me choose my Top Three. And here they are...
Place pork in crock pot and fill 1/2 way up the pork with water. Cook on high for 3-4 hrs. Drain off water. Cut pork in thirds. mix together sauce ingredients and put on top of pork. Cook an additinal 1-2 hrs o high. Shred pork with forks. Return to the crock pot and leave on low until ready to serve.
Because apparently, Sunday school can replace all other school days and the economic recovery is just a prayer day away so no further need for commerce and the apocalypse will restore the earth to the original Eden factory settings including all the oil deposits so no need to be environmental for anyone left behind.
The 30-year-old Fashion Star mentor and fashionista wore a three-quarter sleeved cropped nude Mulberry Spring 2012 leather jacket over a black Winter Kate ‘Riya’ cocktail mini dress with a tribal-inspired print. The short frock was accessorized with House of Harlow 1960 accessories including bracelets and cocktail rings, a black House of Harlow 1960 ‘Chelsea’ sunglasses and black Casadei pumps.
Jewish self-defense is as evil as the Holocaust and will kill the Zionists who, having turned away from God, are guilty of the holocaust to come, and perhaps of the Holocaust that was, the picture tells me. It reminds me of a chilling report by the Washington Post in 2005, which quoted Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad calling the Holocaust a myth. "They (the Jews) have created a myth in the name of the Holocaust and consider it above God, religion and the prophets," Ahmadinejad was quoted as saying.
25. Lawn furniture can be easily cleaned with a rinse of 1/4 cup baking soda in 1 quart warm water.
Since September 15th, police have been through over 150 armed actions against heavy crime areas. 400 people have been visited, and 150 have been detained. The Pakis’ gangs have evolved into full-blown criminal networks, writes Aftenposten.no [censored already — translator].
The people in this story are claiming that they had bad service. Maybe they did, maybe they didn't. It does happen but not as often as people like this claim. I am thinking it is more likely that they are just cheap. They knew the rules when they came in and looked at the menu. If they didn't it was their own fault for not paying more attention. If they didn't want to tip they should have gone to McDonald's.
This wasn't an abstract fear getting my heart racing, wondering what might happen if... This was a cold, sinking fear that started in the middle of my chest and spread outward. I knew what would happen if. I could see it all playing out in horrific detail. I imagined having to break the news to other people, to tell my parents and friends, having to say it out loud over and over again, having to put my worst nightmare into words and endure the pity and the shock from friends and acquaintances and strangers.
"Whosoever finds my last request - Tell Margot in Baymouth to look behind her."
Since 2006 Ferrari North America has also been organizing the Ferrari 612 Scaglietti HGTS to the ferrari f355 challenge ps2 after arrest than in the ferrari f355 challenge arcade in January 1958 with a flexible chassis, tough-to-shift, non-synchro transaxle and unforgiving rear suspension geometry, made a bad driver look good. The 250 LM, built with a predictable solid rear axle, Watts link rear suspension, and easy-to-use, five-speed synchromesh transmission, made a real Formula One champion Michael Schumacher will help sort things out - the ferrari f355 challenge arcade game and Enzo Ferrari, and it has had a mind of its development.
- I thought at first that perhaps Emily had gotten “enhanced”, but then I realized it was simply because we couldn’t tell her real size until she lost the weight.
I was a good girl.
Please be sure to read my rules for entering and remember, I no longer can ship outside US/Canada. Thanks, and good luck. More giveaways to come.
Henna Tattoo (Red) – Chelle
I love the Lord and what He is doing. I am sitting here reflecting on His teaching in my life and how cohesive it has been. I’m sure this hasn’t been as reflective in the blog but I sure am trying. He is pouring into me through some very interesting sources.
The following `Gift of BASCA’ Awards will be presented on the day:
Let us now consider how we can solve the larger problem, the provision on a sustainable basis of home purchaser finance.
Consider this. Siberia is itself 13.1million sq.km. (5.1mil. sq.mi.) or a staggering 75% of the whole landmass of The Russian Federation.
Many women using mental health services are likely to have experienced sexual or physical abuse at some time in their lives. Research in 2004 showed that domestic violence cost the health service £1.4 billion.Violent experiences can clearly have very damaging long-term consequences for women including physical and mental health problems. With regard to violence in the community, sexual harassment, for example, can not only be humiliating, it may constitute a health and safety problem.
Police officers – some in riot gear and others with scooters – stood guard in front of the New York Stock Exchange and the entrance to Goldman Sachs in the Financial District as chanting protesters marched south.
Once I had the text fields laid out, the background graphic and the main character graphic were easy to move around. I still have to place the ISBN on the back cover. And move the placement of the spine text and back cover text, after I obtain the final spine width, but for now, I think this cover works.
The first speaker of the day was mr. Gebbia, CEO of AirBnB. The succes story was introduced by the fact that two people slept on stage the night before. This was the basis on which AirBnB exists – opening your own home for others to stay overnight. Talking about the issues they (three men of AirBnB) have overcome before reaching an astonishing 5 million people having stayed overnight with strangers! 5 million. Now the people here in Amsterdam know about it as well. I will take a look at it when I go abroad next time.
You awoke for unknown reasons, and had a very short time to find a Simulacrum. Roll 1d100 on this table to find what Simulacrum you chose.
I am so excited to become a licensed provider of Envelopments products because I believe in their quality and their mission. Keep your eye out for some really fun inspiration to start showing up here.
Two nights ago I got home at around midnight and started getting ready for bed because I had work early in the morning. I changed into my sexy pink Winnie the Pooh-themed pajamas, and went upstairs to take some medicine and grab a glass of water. As I stuffed my mouth with drugs, I heard a key being turned in the front door’s lock. I didn’t think much of it. I assumed it was my flatmate, we’ll call him Chet, also getting in late. I sipped some water to swallow my health-helpers.
And last but not least, be watching for changes to streamline and connect all the websites, blogs, facebook, fan pages, etc. I'm hoping it will work the way I imagine it in my brain. Hoping being the operative word there. So please be patient with us as we attempt to figure it all out, and hopefully, it will be even better. :)
So thank goodness I didn't disgrace both myself and them by forming an opinion on those two beers alone. Having tried a few other beers in their range, I can now see that Gold and No. 7 are beers that sit deliberately in the 'solid & reliable' area of their output.
From Carmarthen to Karabagh by Patrick Thomas is published by Gwasg Carreg Gwalch at £7.50.
Cabin in the Sky – 1
Someone call Bear Grylls. We have his match.
I may tinker and will continue to ponder teams like Northwestern, Iona, Mississippi, Mississippi State, Washington, and some others. The really questionable ones that I have IN at the moment are South Florida, Drexel and Seton Hall. I will not bat an eye if any of those are left out.
9.Ben Covington - Mule Skinner Moan
Final Report on the Plain Tobacco Packaging (Removing Branding from Cigarette Packs) Bill 2009, 2010, Senate Community Affairs Committee.
Campers, tell us about the staff members you particularly love, and why they’re so great! Tell us what you see in them that make you want to come back to camp every summer!
Cardigan: Bright pink cropped cardigan from WAREHOUSE
Let’s say there’s a book about a historical memoir of a woman in 1802. The writer had better not write the words “cool”, “OMG”, “hanging out”, or anything of the like within the prose. It might work for a modern day story, but it sure as hell doesn’t work for a story set in 1802.
growing stronger amidst the trials of my life.
4) Everyone is happy. This situation all seems perfectly logical, if you are a cat.
On cream colored heavyweight vinyl from Gold Robot Records. These were made to be remixed and your wish is granted with the bonus digital only tracks. Check out "Settle Down":
and weave a raft, take to the Landwehrkanal,
So when you put it all together and combine the meanings of these symbols it is saying,
So he gave me some exercises to do and showed me how to massage the muscle next to my shin that was giving me the grief. Over a few months the pain subsided to next to nothing.
Wednesday was fun-filled as well! My sister and I went to Peach's school to work their Christmas party. Another mom and I planned about 7 games and a craft for the kids to do during their party. I think they had a ton of fun, but I have no photographic proof. When you are in charge of the party and directing little 5 and 6 yr olds, it's kinda hard to snap photos with your good (big) camera as well. It's so weird to actually do some mom things that I've been looking forward to since I knew I was going to be a mom--IE coordinate a class party!
Jamie and Joanne are mother and daughter clients of mine who where ready for a big change. They both have VERY fine hair with big cowlicks in the front. Jamie, the daughter, has more curl and body, but was ready for a big change. Joanne was sick of having to spend all morning trying to give a style to her limp hair. She wanted something fun and easy to work with. They have plans to attend a big wedding next weekend and wanted to show off their drastic change to their friends and family. Let's just say, having clients like them totally make my day.
Apologies, been on a bit of a holiday and all, but now we’re back.
This is what I have done so far
Bruno said he enjoyed it but it was somewhere between barmy and mad. Carrie Ann told him he was lacking form and it was kind of hard to tell it was a Samba, but loved that he was joyful the whole way through. Len called it more of a Shamba than a Samba, but said it was a gallant effort.
Blame yourself.
It's my usual last minute rush for Easter cards, so I'm afraid I've gone very CAS (....so sorry to any of my family who are expecting a fancy card Ha!)
My first story-
They reversed exactly what they did to get from Northeast Philly to Haddonfield. Speedline to train. Train to bus. Bus to the corner of Frankford and Rhawn. By the time they walked up Rhawn Street and stood in the street in front of Chris’s house, it was a little past 3 in the morning.
Laud the glorious Conception
I'm grateful that all of you SURVIVED. I'm SO fortunate to call you my friends. I don't mind if you had to stop and save it for another race. I don't mind if you had to walk. I don't mind if you had to jog or hold a stranger's hand while they sat along the sidelines.
P.S. Anyone else excited about the upcoming Beowulf film? I'm a little worried though, with them employing the now standard ancient accent, because apparently long ago the whole world had the same English-speaking accent. It also describes Hrothgar as the corrupt king, and i don't remember that from the book. And with such great lines as, "I'm here to kill your monster," well... It does feature Angelina Jolie though, as the voice of Grendel's mother. I've never disliked Angelina in a film, and Grendel's mother promises to be interesting.
So: the notion that asking the rich to pay more taxes is the same as attacking them is, shall we say, false. If you’re rich, and you want to know when people are attacking you, keep an eye pealed for the torches and pitchforks.
Chedva has no idea how greatly I needed to see Gili's work.
Me: "Nope, just checked. It isn't sleeping with the fishes, is it?"
Right now, Broadmore is working full time on the Grordbort world, and he couldn't be more thrilled about that. But that doesn't prevent him from dreaming of other, weirder projects that mash history up with the future. "I really want to do a series showing New Zealand sort of reclaimed by nature, and in among the jungle foliage, you'd see dinosaurs wandering around next to old World War I equipment that's rusting away. And maybe I'd put some Atari computers in there too. All of those seem like ancient things to me that sort of belong together." Dinosaurs, tanks, and Ataris in the New Zealand jungle? Sign me up for one of those paintings, please.
1/2 cup seeded tomato
When the Hat’s brim
At least one court of appeals has specifically addressed whether a social advocate selling t-shirts that carried the group’s social message was engaging in noncommercial speech, despite the fact that the group sold the t-shirts to the public for profit. See Ayers v. City of Chicago, 125 F.3d 1010 (7th Cir. 1997). In Ayers, the court distinguished limitations on “the sale of goods that are not themselves forms of protected speech,” noting that precedent allows more restriction on sales of nonexpressive goods than it does on goods that are forms of protected speech. Id. at 1015. The court likened t-shirts carrying messages of social advocacy to “the
70. Paolo Apollo Negri - Love Potion #9 (5:16)
Given the modern technology scholarship in the on line form of social networking have also emerged as articulated by Brian Stterfield (2006), according to the fore said scholar, Online social networking is a form of social networking which involves connecting and sharing of information with other like minded people via online sites such as yahoo groups, my space, of the most recent facebook and twitter as well as blogs.
Echo is normal. Kidneys and liver normal. No diabetes. Other than the hypertension, high cholesterol, and the severe spinal stenosis, he is in pretty good shape.
The links to the JK, SK and school February calendars and newsletters are posted on the right side of the blog.
the ones who call the shots won’t be among the dead and lame
what has come from me?
He was released without making any plea or any charge proffered against him. Nor was he ordered to appear before the magistrate.
I have a new little thing that I picked up yesterday that I can't wait to share with you. I will share that with you tomorrow.
--Cosmetic & Laser Center of Bay Ridge
I mentioned earlier that you wouldn’t notice the RLD in the day unless you looked hard enough, which is true, but here’s what you would see if you were paying attention:
"The sun went down with practiced bravado. Twilight crawled across the sky, laden with foreboding. I didn't like the way the show started, but they had given me the best seat in the house, front row center." Sometimes it's just plain clunky:
This weekend one of my nephews will be auditioning for Julliard’s dance program. The kid just might be talented and skilled, enough to get accepted. Whether or not he wants to go there or elsewhere (and whether or not my brother can afford it for him) are beside the point. I’m proud of him for taking a leap (no dance pun intended) into going after what he wants. I’m not surprised really. He’s been dancing since he was a little kid, and he’s been fortunate to have supportive parents, quality teachers and lots of access to classes and troupes.
With that in mind, I will be looking for a new weekend part-time job to replace my old one since it’ll just be too much of a drive to get to. I got time to hunt around, but I’m hoping that I don’t end up with something that makes me want to yank my hair out! My library (full-time) job is just so nice because the people want to be there! They want to talk to you, want you to help them out, want to read books and learn, participate in community events, and just simply enjoy life more than sitting on your couch watching MTV marathons of Jersey Shore. The sad thing is that it’s not quite enough money for myself to live by so until I get further into the field, I’ll still need some extra income on the weekends. On the plus side, I genuinely enjoy working…. so whatever job I may pick up, I will find reasons to like it.
I had initially thought of "Honor" as being similar in "Valor" as a virtue. It seems that valor could include honor as well as other positive or strong attributes during a danger or fight. So many parts to comprise valor, I can see how a few might be seen lower in value than discretion.
When Dan Patrick covered the Penn State scandal with such skill and insight he raised the bar for sports journalists and broadcasters. He courageously answered his call and responsibility as a man with talent. He embraced his position of having a powerful voice in the media and used it as an opportunity to raise awareness. His was a shining moment in broadcasting and one in which the world of news media should use as a lesson in ethical and honorable reporting.
DUBAI – A European Union member of parliament with a diplomatic passport said she was prevented from entering Bahrain on Sunday in an application of visa rules imposed while the government grapples with a pro-democracy movement.
Because this frustrates me so, especially after all that I have gone through with computer woes this past year, I really needed to end this post with something light and amusing. Here is an ad that I believe is running in Great Britain.
Elk Grove, CA 94624
Grue shut the kitchen door behind us, and for a moment, all was dark, quiet and still.
The network says JC is on its development slate, steps away from the pilot stage and eventual airing. Many television series in development never make it to air.
Here are some overused words that I've found in my own writing and they might be something that others commonly overuse as well.
beat
Beau Badem & AHA Member Chris Bowen
Under Sharia Law Dhimmitide is the submissive state that the people of the book (Christians and Jews) are permitted to live in as long as they pay their allotted Jizya (protection money).
Victory, for me as one of the billions, is then to be found in the heart of God: to become one with Jesus in his death and one with Him in his life.
3 tablespoons hazelnut oil, more as needed
They made their way down a hallway to the break room. It was cheerful and brightly
This podcast is a slightly extended podcast because we really take time to chat about the "whispers", and Anil from The ODI rants about why he did not like the way the whispers were answered.
I also read this poem, which caught the most attention from listeners. They were reacting so much that my laughter ended up showing out at times.
Recent statements in Cairo by Sheikh Yousef Al-Qaradhawi sparked public debate over the status of the Shi’ites in Egypt. Al-Qaradhawi said that the increasing infiltration of Shi’ite Islam into Egypt, which is predominantly Sunni, may lead to a civil war like the one in Iraq. This statement was denounced by Egyptian Shi’ites, as well as by the religious establishment in Egypt and by columnists in the Egyptian press. Conversely, there were some who supported Al-Qaradhawi’s position, saying that the spread of Shi’ism constituted a threat to Egypt and to the region as a whole.
Later that night, Tracey and I compared stories and learned that a policeman had responded to the call as well. Now, if you're Van at this point - who is one of the MOST empathetic children I know! - and feeling horrible about the accident as well as thinking you're in trouble - having the police show up does not do wonders for your physche!
Goliath finds Deryn and Alec aboard The Leviathan yet again for the last leg of their round-the-world adventure. After rescuing a rumored mad man from the depths of Siberia, they head to Japan, California, Mexico, and finally New York City. But things are far from smooth sailing. As they race farther and farther from the war, Alec finds himself frustrated that Brittan’s greatest war ship is not in the thick of the action. Meanwhile, Deryn is desperate to tell Alec her secret, while keeping it from the rest of her crew. As America falls closer to war and the Germans desperate to pull ahead, can Alec and Deryn stop the war and reclaim Alec’s throne? Or will they find something better to fight for.
Oranges, Valencia — California
In order to test the thing you are working on is working, you need to put it in front of people. Build the minimum viable product is a good thing to aim for. Don’t build past what you need to build to answer the questions. Start everything as “what is V1 of this feature”. Fail early and fail often, make failing as cheap as possible. You need to fail to find the right solution. You need to fail your way to success. It is notable that the Instagram guys gave their initial prototypes to people that had large twitter followings in certain communites. Especially the designer community and people that would have an interest in this type of iPhone app. This is something that Malcolm Gladwell talks to that helps spread an idea quickly. Finding those influential people that have many contacts and push over other people. They go on to say that although it proved successful, they still believe that the fact that the product was useful and usable were the most influential factors of why it became such a success.
Construction timeline
Check the posts on these forums and check out the forums themselves.
Learn how to draw pictures of street dogs in a creative and fun way.
Great Divide Brewing Company Belgian Titan IPA
No one even sheds one tear
"Despite his earthbound approach and his preoccupation with scientific fact, Aristotle had an acute understanding of the nature and importance of religion and mythology (...) Hence his famous literary theory that tragedy effected a purification (katharsis) of the emotions of terror and pity that amounted to an experience of rebirth."
burning bright
On a similar but different note, one of the endeavors I have been engaged in is working with an organization, Victory Martial Arts, to promote their anti-bullying program.
But it got me to thinking…. what would I want at my memorial service? I say memorial service because I wish to be cremated, at least, whatever is left after donating organs and so forth. I just want a big party with plenty of food and booze and for everyone to wear something red, and the gals to wear red lipstick, and the kids to have a petting zoo complete with goats and ponies, and maybe a llama, and a band that plays Big Band music.
To beg a tale of breath too weak
COOP Class
Direct taxes must be apportioned among the states, not among the people. The 16th Amendment did not change this! As we learned, the income tax is an excise tax on corporate profit, and always has been, therefore it does not need to be apportioned. Before the 16th Amendment, an individual’s income was NOT taxable, either with apportionment or without. Eliminating apportionment, among the states, would still require the tax to be imposed on the states, not on the people. To better understand this concept, let’s look at an actual example of taxation by apportionment.
A couple of weeks ago on our way to the airport to head to Boulder, we stopped by a house that had come on the market the day before in our ideal area. As I mentioned here, 23 other people also looked at the same house the same day. I have no clue how many people total looked at the house. There is nothing coming on the market in this particular area, and this confirms that there are a bunch of other buyers who are just queuing up.
It was the first time since November that the level was below 200,000.
The two women sitting up in the bottom of the boat looked up at Pitcher.
I strode toward the bakery entrance; I was here to purchase light bulbs for a fish tank, and maybe a bag of oranges because I’d been fighting the flu. As I watched me and my flowing shadow pass over the oil stains like a low-lying cloud, I brushed too close to a car I thought was empty – a tiny gray coupe in the worst shape possible, something driven out of a nightmare or a junk lot, half its pieces missing and broken. It was double parked on the diagonal yellow stripes.
Josh Mendelsohn, Vice President of Chadwick Martin Bailey, sums it up nicely:
Once the intelligence pointed precisely to the compound in Abbottabad –- a town 35 miles north of Pakistan's capital of Islamabad –- the work on the mission began between the intelligence and military communities.
Kind of the same thing is happening now, in a way. My biological father wanted a son. He was sure that he’d have a son. Then I popped out and spoiled his fun. I don’t really know when my parents’ marriage began to fall apart, but I have a feeling that even then things weren’t so good ’cause they decided to not have another child. I don’t know why and no one has ever tried to tell me a reason, so it’s just a guess on my part. But, good ol’ dad knew he’d have at least a decade before puberty would set-in and make me the daughter he couldn’t pretend I wasn’t. So he taught me about cars and guns and sports and I was the epitome of a tomboy. Oh sure, I had Barbie dolls and other girly toys, but if I was playing with friends, they were usually boys and I loved their toys WAY much more than my stuff.
For me, becoming a mum was a journey that took 15 years of my life. It stripped me away to the core and literally ripped my insides out. Becoming a mum was something I knew I had to do as part of my journey in this life. I knew that to heal my child within that I had to be a mum myself. I was right and it was worth every single second of pain that I experienced. Katie fills my life and has helped me heal my heart. The giving of myself to this person is like the marriage vows I made 18 years ago, "til death do us part". I made those vows to my husband and they are vows that I have held close to me since that day. My relationship with my daughter is the same. Adopting Katie was not a decision I made lightly. It is for the rest of my life. She may not have been born from me but she has definitely been born within me. My love for her runs through my veins and is a part of me. I cannot imagine that ever not being there now. It is something that I would fight to the ends of this earth for.
playfully
The Fibromyalgia Support Group in Inverness has not responded to my email, and further searching has not indicated any particular doctors with an understanding of fibromyalgia in the area. In this case, I figure I'll save myself the travel and register at the medical clinic in Ullapool. There's only one. There are a few practicing doctors there, so even if none of them have any experience with fibromyalgia there must surely be at least one I feel comfortable talking to.
Women’s rights in Morocco have come under the spotlight recently after a young woman was assaulted in a Rabat market by people she called “Salafists,” or ultra-conservative Islamists. She said she was accosted by the men because of the short dress she was wearing.
The meal was fantastic – just what the doctor ordered and my wonderful husband had to retract his comment about Indian food not being spicy (although he can definitely take it a lot hotter than I can – which is saying something!)!! This curry really packed a punch and since my heat tolerance seems to have gone up recently and my cravings for spicy food have intensified this hit the spot perfectly! The perfect Friday night feast enjoyed with my husband and an ice cold beer or two!
It also showed nothing but an old empty page in my blogger account instead of my blog and all the blogs I follow.
No one can deny Chipotle (NYSE: CMG) can make a mean burrito. But is the stock worth more than $400? The stock has powered up almost 20% since the first of the year in an almost unbroken line:
Denise: I write romantic suspense. Romantic suspense is what I love to read so it’s what I love to write.
Yusef Lateef & Adam Rudolph, Towards The Unknown
My last class of the semester was Saturday and I have a complete week off before getting back into the school grind on the 12th. My intent was to upload songs every night since Saturday but I would get home, get busy and totally spaced it and then the divishare issue. I did spend some time Sunday scanning and recording to the computer so I have some songs ready to go. I went to the record show the previous Sunday and did pretty well. I bought nearly 100 45's from one guy for less than a buck a piece, and also picked up some RSD left overs that I had wanted. For tonights upload enjoy a record show find from last week.
2 eggs, beaten
It’s safe to say that first and foremost before they were 100 Monkeys, the entertainers, G, J, Uncle, Jackson and Jerad were friends. They stuck together through thick and thin, along with Marty and Scott, things were pretty sweet and peachy. But, once the tour finished and new managers came along, things because stricter, more organized. Some said this was good, some said it was too much for the boys. But, they powered through until someone better came along. Forget Creamer. Forget Tim. This was the era of Lani Sarem.
By JOHN HANNA Kansas legislators who are pushing for income tax cuts said Monday they're willing to tinker with their latest plan to avoid a budget shortfall and address a big concern of a bipartisan group already skeptical of the proposal.
We both know that you know how I feel. I know you do, but for some reason we can't talk about it. I know it would change everything. But that's not what I want to write about, that's kind of a secret, we both know about it, but, for some reason couldn't happen, and sometimes I think about it.
You have 14 days to appeal in writing. Your employer must arrange an appeal meeting. If your request is turned down again, your only resort is to your firm’s grievance procedure or an outside body, such as an employment tribunal.
With over 10,000 pre-registered attendees and countless more who registered on-site, the Washington State Convention Center was as packed as ever for the Northwest’s largest Japanese Anime and Culture Convention on April 6-8. With Sakuracon 2012 behind me, I think I am almost fully recovered from all the stress, chaos, and awesomeness that happened to me during that weekend.
It was easy! (relatively!)
Weather...finally the sun is out and it's warming up to 79! It stormed like crazy here this morning.
13. Someone just called about a coffee table I had advertised on Craigslist. 20 minutes after answering that call, I now have $27.49 to my name.
Wuthering Heights was first published 1847 under the name Ellis Bell.
‘The first Christian generation was globally hostile to political power and regarded it as bad no matter what its orientation or constitutional structures.’
You’re doing a great job. You’re the best dad in the world. I’m sorry the moms at story time won’t let you into their circle, but I don’t want you talking to other women anyway.
We made this for a big dinner the other night where we fed about 120 people. It doubles (and quadruples) easily and we got so many compliments. I think it might be my favorite salad. The box of European Salad Mix was from Costco. For real. So yummy. Try it.
No legislature ever passed a bill to create it. No governor signed it into law. The LCD was created ex nihilo. Although it is invisible, lacking both form and substance, it nonetheless continues to work its will on the citizens of Minnesota.
Dustin is starting the poly process today and will finish it tonight or early in the morning. We are going to try to do 4 coats. Hopefully we have enough!
Great. Well guess what? Forbes sucks. No, I am not going to link the story because it will pad Forbes' statistics.
Oh My Goodness! Oh My Goodness! What a wonderful surprise....
to never wake up
Cream butter and sugar, add mashed bananas, eggs, vanilla ... then add flour (sifted if you can be bothered) and baking powder ... then dissolve the bicarb in the warm milk and add, mix slightly.
2010, you culminated in a insane and deliriously exciting Christmas Holiday. I packed my old apartment and then accepted a conditional job offer that would land me in a wonderful position and with 36% more income. I spent 6 lovely days at my parents house and enjoyed celebration of togetherness and successes. The Outer Banks experienced 9 inches of snow and my boyfriend earned his sainthood by managing to arrange everything to make sure we were moved into our new home together on time. Our home is coming together and I will soon give my resignation at my first "real" job to move forward to bigger and better things.
There are several locked shops in Diagon Alley. I’m hoping they unlock later in the series, otherwise, what is the point of having them? Gringotts is quite limiting as well: you don’t even get an animation of the ride down to your vault. All you do is use the key to unlock the door. Right now, it seems like there is a lot on Pottermore that needs to be fixed or needs to be unlocked in order to make the site more interesting.
Once again, we'll be looking for innovative ways to market this year's edition, including (but not limited to) tweeting excerpts of each work (where permission
Well there you have it. A much better option.
Between midterms, collecting books, Jerry's commitments and my own, we've had a busy couple of weeks. Still, we managed to drive up to Northern California this past weekend for a quick trip to celebrate the first birthday of my niece, Layla.
Have you ever had one of those weeks with your kids???
When children are in school all day, mostly sitting and being controlled and not being provided with opportunities for authentic engagement (that means doing things they find interesting, that relate to their lives and that they have a purpose for learning), they get home and they need to decompress and use those hours to do what they enjoy and that they can't do at school. Often this involves technology and screens of some sort. Of course there are those kids who are scheduled and controlled for every waking house, but that will have to wait for another blog post. Kids have no problem paying attention to media or a book or any activity they choose and enjoy because of intrinsic motivation. If they aren't paying attention in school it's generally because they aren't engaged, they find the school environment inhospitable or they are coping with the social challenges of school including bullying. If we really want to "improve children's well-being" as the official site says we would take children out of the institutional setting of school and create opportunities for learning that are fun and innovative instead of pretending that making kids turn off media for a week is a "fun and innovative opportunity."
One can understand why desperate, decent people would obtain a gun illegally. The police take hours to respond to burglary calls. Sometimes a burglary victim who has captured the burglar may be told to take the burglar to the police station himself, because the police cannot send someone out.
RATING: 9/10 I can’t go the full ‘10’ because as of press time I’m just not feeling it. Or maybe I’m just hoping that film noir gets even better than this and want to save my ‘10’ for one of the next five.
Walter Manzke (Le Saint Amour, Church & State, Bastide) Santa Barbara Prawns Thai Curry, Spring Pea
Ain’t love grand?
Pour over crunchy ciabatta bread or serve as a side dish.
From ghoulies and ghosties and long-leggety beasties...
Tonight, JMT attempts to interview special guest Jeremy Hibnick with hilariously unexpected results. Enjoy!
Some of us women have the equipment, but not the desire, for kids. Some of us have such piss poor kidney jing that the rigors of parenthood would have been crushing in some way or another. A sickly mom is not a great idea, nor is an endlessly depressed mother. I have a sense I would have been both. Poor kids! Poor dad! Poor me. Ah thank God it never came to pass.
me: I’d love to hear what Steven has to say…
I've really been feeling the pressure to get moving on the room Cameron and his new brother or sister will be sharing. I mentioned awhile back that I want to build a tall bookshelf and a bed for Cameron, and I want to get that done before I get huge and uncomfortable. I think we're going to buy lumber this weekend so I can go ahead and start while I still feel great.
· The stereotype of drunken Irish bar-fighters applies mostly to Irish-Americans.
Lastly, we want to make note in the difference of natural evil versus moral evil. David Platt preaches on natural and moral evil and says the following. “Moral evil primarily includes sin. Moral evil is wickedness, inequity, transgression, sin. It’s the evil that we believe, the evil that we do. Satan draws us into, tempts us to sin. Moral evil includes sin. But that’s not the only picture of evil that we see. We also see in all the Scripture and in the Gospels natural evil, which primarily includes suffering. This is not necessarily stuff that we do, but stuff that may happen to us; maybe natural disasters, sickness that is brought on. It’s different. It’s evil, but it’s not moral evil in the same way sin is. It’s different. Natural evil includes suffering.” “Now obviously they are connected; moral evil is ultimately the cause of natural evil. It goes all the way back to the beginning; we have catastrophic things that happen, natural disasters, tornadoes, hurricanes, as a result of sin’s entrance into the world in Genesis 3.”
We're gonna make it through this, everybody!
Moms (and dads, too!) have tremendous influence over the dietary habits of their children, as well as the foods and chemicals used around the home. Those habits- good or bad- can stick with their children well into adulthood.
As each year goes by, I'm never quite sure how Katie is going to respond on this sad anniversary. Every year is different. As she grows older and more mature, she processes things differently. She sees things differently. She remembers things differently. But she always remembers. When she came down for breakfast this morning, I could see it in her eyes. She knew what day it was. It's strange how a simple date on a calendar can have such a profound effect on how a person feels. It should be just another Thursday in July, but it's not. I know what this date means for her, and how it makes her feel. I feel it too. The overwhelming feeling of sadness is like a crushing weight on your shoulders, and it's almost impossible to shake it off.
Oh No...
Even though Banrock (aka the Bunny ofHope: chief Muse, desk builder and partner in crime) and I spent AGES building an actual desk... I never use it to write. I don't know why: it just doesn't feel right. Why I like to write in bed is mostly tied up in my answer to the next question. And in the Shack in the afternoon, I am removed from all distractions, hidden away. The internet doesn't work that far from the house, and the only one who bothers me there is Distractor Cat from two doors down. She likes to evict my laptop for cuddles.
A place that night in the Officers’ Mess,
The only complaint I had about the novel is that there are a lot of characters with a lot of story going on. I want to learn more. How about a sequel, The Three Colonels and a Captain, with Captain Wentworth?
So let’s compare a little of that eloquence to see what the Blarney Stone wrought…
Annabella Do you have a favorite quilting book?
The shopkeeper said the Taliban demanded all non-muslims to pay a tax, jizya, but the poor ones had no money to give them.
It would seem that somewhere along the way, the great day-by-day “Freedom” videography of the T-ara/Mystery7 Cisalpine tour plan got derailed. Besides some scattered selcas, we never saw Switzerland at all (and wasn’t Austria on the itinerary too?). What happened? Did Eunjung’s stolen purse mean there wasn’t money to upload footage? We did at least get Eunjung’s snow goddess selca from Switzerland, and now this gorgeousness from Hyomin:
about how well we’ve spread the message of our faith.
A small jar with sponges and baby oil in it just to soak the sponge so that your blending stups don’t get too much oil on them. (Excess oil can soak into the paper.)
I’m having a little weep in my office. My heart is hammering in my chest, I’m sitting on the edge of panic but you know what? I don’t even care. I have black mascara dripping down my face and onto my white blouse….any second, someone might open the door and walk in on me. In truth, I’d rather be caught picking my nose than crying, but you don’t get to choose those things in life.
7. Kay Starr - I'll Never Be Free
Such a good analogy of the Christian faith and walk, isn’t it? Isn’t it also our desire to usher in our friends and relatives and those around us right into Heaven, but soon find out that we cannot change their minds or heart and/or force them to see what a great thing God has done for us?
Apparently a woman of formidable strength, which I have to assume after trying to pick up her work, Mishima Kimiyo (born 1932) makes ceramic sculpture using silkscreen as a featured technique. She wishes to pry from her audience the understanding that our trash is filling the world, and if not dealt with soon, it will come to represent us to future generations. So, she presents trash from our food packages and newspapers as a potential contemporary icon.
You know you can do better, but I didn’t feel that you tried.
On top of the record deportations and extrajudicial assassinations[1], the recently-enacted National Defense Authorization Act (NDAA) legalizes indefinite detention without trial and confirms Obama’s abandonment of his principles. He pledged to shut down the Guantanamo Bay detention camp within the first year of his presidency, and last week the Gitmo torture facility marked its tenth anniversary. Combined with the NDAA, I am overwhelmed by disgust and rage when I think about how the U.S. treats its prisoners and the audacity of Obama’s political hypocrisy.
Ukranian Isolation
Round its little grave we linger,
I’m a dreamer but I know what I can do and can’t do,
But after Acts 12, there is another apostle who comes into view. That is the apostle Paul, sent to be the Apostle to the Gentiles. To him was given the message of the grace of God. In Ephesians 3:2 we read,
So if I'm so shy, why do I blog? And how?
Wait, this kid’s dad died fighting the Scourge in Northrend? But that would mean…oh crap.
85. Plan family night ones a month.
Much Love to My Ladies and Happy Meeting,
After the jury’s verdict, prosecutor Dave Chapman, standing under an umbrella in pouring rain, said, “There are no winners in this case. There’s nothing but loss everywhere.” The permanent loss of a young woman beloved by her family, friends, and teammates. The loss of liberty outside prison in the murderer’s 26-year sentence.
Once dough has risen, split into thirds.
The bill is big step for the Commonwealth, but activists note, their work isn’t over yet.
(Mumme was once praised as “a safe and speedy remedy, to remove the unnatural heat of the stomach, and giddiness in the head, contracted / by drinking French Brandy.” So you allegedly could get pissed on French brandy, and then sober up by drinking mum. Wonder how efficacious that was?)
"Ohman!!!! Gush, gush, gush, gush, gush! I absolutely ADORED this book! And I mean ADORED! It is the cutest book I have read since, well, since I read The Enchanted Forest Chronicles by Patricia C. Wrede. And that's appropriate because, with a debut like My Sparkling Misfortune, Laura Lond really might just be the next Patricia C. Wrede. If you've read them, think of Princess Cimorene's quirky primness coming from a bad guy who is actually good but would never want to admit it and replace the dragons with sparklings, and you've got My Sparkling Mifortune.
And eventually nothing.
Tangled Shadows
If you love the cricut world as much as I do then you will be thrilled to know that they just launched a new blog. Make sure you go check it out HERE to become a follower and leave a comment for your chance to win an awesome prize..... $100 store credit to cricut.com!!! I am so excited for this blog as I know it will be a great source of inspiration and the latest news!
As he rode down to Camelot.
respect, charting their alterations and passings. Paying careful attention
Good for them. It is an alcohol product. Is total ignorance now an official temperance goal? Would they be happier if kids thought it was lemonade?
But we adults often do! Does a river of fear run between you and OUR Lord Jesus Christ? If you wave our Lord Jesus away, joy will die; laughter will perish, and tomorrow will be buried in today’s grave of dread. Don’t make that mistake.
Essentials: £8.50 a cocktail, one red, one white and one rose wine, three champagnes and a beer complete the menu. Bar snacks available (but not yet sampled). Late licence.
There was an excellent chicken farm on the premises, and Eskom offered electricity so the owners could obtain a contract with Rainbow Chicken. But there was no management or planning from the government’s side. “The extension officers were not up to standard”, said the farmer. “In the old days, extension officers were qualified specialists. This is not the case today”.
I have such fond memories of inching down Reforma, one of the main arteries of Mexico City, for hours on end in my burgundy shoebox of a Chevy with zero air conditioning. Wearing exhaust fumes like a fine perfume. Buying all of my cleaning products at intersections. Chatting to beggars in broken español. Singing along to the songs on that weird Mariachi radio station without actually knowing the words (cept for Cielito Lindo. Everyone knows Cielito Lindo. Besides it's just a whole lot of ay ay ay ay and then some more ay ay ay). Watching my suction cup Jesus gently sway in the furiously circulating lukewarm air. And believe it or not, sometimes playing sudoku. Honest.
French writer, photographer and artist Claude Cahun (1894 - 1954) is quite new to me. I have most certainly seen some of her photos before, but I didn't know until recently that she was one of the first to experiment with her persona in self portraits. Her current exhibition at the Jeu de Paume in Paris is the perfect opportunity to get to know her work better. When seeing it, I immediately felt connected to her sense of surrealism, the way she disguises herself and the play with photomontage. Some of her images also reminds me of pictures that has influenced me through the years. A personal look back:
I have mentioned something about psychology before, and it shows that from OR to AND there is psychological problems. Shown here
“Your present. And you totally suck, dude, because you didn’t give me time to wrap it.”
What are your hobbies, besides writing and reading?
The eye-test poster (seen most clearly after Frank and Freddy run into Burt's office after hearing the first re-animated cadaver) in Burt's office actually reads "Burt is a slave driver and a cheap son of a bitch who's got you and me here" if you put the letters together.
As expected , Megan Goethels (Mo) won the title defeating 4 time Footlocker qualifier Emily Sisson (MO) (pictured below). Megan is returning to FL where she was 3rd place last year and should challenge Chelsey Sveinsoon for the win.
People contract belly fat in two ways, subcutaneous and visceral. Subcutaneous fat forms under the thighs, hips, buttocks and abdomen. This type of fat is visible to the eyes. Visceral fat is invisible, forms inside the body, and attached itself to some of the vital organs such as the lungs, heart, kidneys, liver and digestive tract as well as other places of importance.
We say that we are furious because Theophilus Danjuma made $4.5 billion when he sold to a Chinese corporation 45% share of a company he build around the two oil blocks Gen. Sani Abacha “dashed” him. He said that after paying taxes and taking care of all he could think of, he had $500 million left. To avoid having his children fight over too much money after he’s dead, he used $100 million to set up a Foundation. What does that say to you? Do you need from us a solution on that?
Buttoning blue jeans is right out. Blow drying my hair is almost impossible. Putting on mascara with my left hand is tedious. Making tea (thankfully) is no problem. Opening items with a twist off top requires me to sit down and use my legs as vice to hold whatever needs to be opened. Texting left handed is a hoot! (if you have free texting, text me- I'll gladly email you my number). I'm a rabid texter with both hands and I can write paragraphs easily in a matter of seconds, but left handed my answers look like a 2nd grader got my phone and started drinking.
The up and down nature of this season made it somewhat difficult to rank, as most of the top athletes during the first part of the season failed to finish the season and/or were unable to cross the line in Daegu for the reasons stated above – Mullings, Rodgers, Gay, Bolt, & Powell. The lack of head to heads among the top athletes only make things more difficult, as only Bolt & Powell went head to head in any that mattered for ranking purposes.
And on that note… the sun is shining and I have some liquid sunshine to get stuck into… a piu tarde.
"Twenty-five pounds -and I will help you put it in the car "he said.
Our attending this show was an idea that came about because we need to reach a new audience. We have been attending Christian events such as Spring Harvest and New Wine and had many enthusiastic people visit the stand, but that was the trouble - most already knew about us and our work. So reaching out to a secular audience made sense.
Reimbursement for causally related prescription costs and mileage are available subject to limitations found in the WCL, WCB rules and case law. At the time of this writing, mileage reimbursements are payable at 55.5 cents a mile. Mileage reimbursement rates have changed over time and are controlled by the date of the service as documented in the rules and regulations of the WCL. You are permitted to receive such reimbursements for traveling to and from those health providers handling your case as well as for transportation costs associated with examinations conducted and set up by insurance companies monitoring your case. Transportation costs to and from the court or your attorney are not reimbursable.
Marketing
Though its waters roar and be troubled,
I’m sure you’ve heard of making cakes in a mug. I’ve tried this a few times, and have been somewhat unimpressed with the results. For some reason, I tried it again tonight. The results were decent, definitely needed more sugar, but I think that’s because I used dark chocolate cocoa rather than the regular. I used a recipe from Chocolate Covered Katie’s blog and she calls it One-Minute Chocolate Cake.
Mark Croker, CEO of Smashwords.
There was, of course, never any real doubt as to who was running the show. Jim Ferguson had a desk right alongside his wife’s in the Capitol, and the disgrace of impeachment didn’t slow down his crooked deals one iota. Whenever Ma Ferguson got stumped over an issue a reporter would ask her about, she’d say, “I don’t know that, but I do know that my Redeemer liveth!,” which I imagine made for many awkward silences in her press conferences.
I already had this LP in its much more common mono version, but I was very pleased to find this one in a local charity shop as I find stereo sound gives the listener much more satisfaction.
Apparently, the running is in my genetic make up somewhere. That’s nice to know.
8. Being forced to sit obscenely
Eric has health issues that he needs to attend to. Something about a cyst on his neck that will need surgery and he may lose his voice. Something about a severe thing with his feet. I don’t really remember, because I am more concerned about how this will affect me. There are rumors that he may just be holding out for more money or something. The rumors are coming from him I believe.
One Burrata sac (shown above) will weigh ~ 200 - 300 g.
Anyway, I copied the title (let this be between us) from the Girl who Picked the Hornet's nest but instead of picking and hornets it's sneezing cum because how awful would that be. It's bad enough when it gets in your mouth and he's all waiting for you to pretend that it's a peach cobbler and you're a cum gobbler and you're all... wow, that's ... delicious... but instead of that it's all over your hands and everyone is looking at you and you're all cummy.
I have been searching for the perfect pillows for some time now - ever since I made the mistake of buying new pillows last year and I hate them!!
But still, despite the stupidity of his act, Icarus fascinated me… he was some kind of a hero. After all, he flew! And, last but not least (also literally in this case), he went near the sun, he almost touched it! That was what I also wanted when I was a child: to fly and to be near the sun… To be honest, I still want it – here in Holland I wonder sometimes if the sun really comes up every day; there is no sign of it most days of the year.
“You need to come with me,” he said, and before she could take in what was happening, he dragged her to the white Audi R8 and pushed her into it on the passenger side.
Afternoon and evening hours are devoted to electives - lectures, readings, performances and panel discussions featuring faculty members and distinguished guests. Participants also enjoy a rich schedule of formal and informal social gatherings— author receptions, an open-mic night, breakfasts, lunches and dinners under the tent, and a few surprises.
Finally, give him some time. I’ve never been married, so it’s only been Reggie and me for his whole life. He’s gone everywhere with me, so please include him on your daily car rides if you can. He sits well in the backseat, and he doesn’t bark or complain. He just loves to be around people, and me most especially.
Please alert me if you run across any, and I'll sic my publisher and/or literary agency legal team on them.
For some people it is better to stay in budget, out-of-town hotels, and save themselves a few shekels every night on the bill, than to spend a little bit more and stay in the centre of town. Well I don’t know which is the best policy, I suppose it is different for different people with different outlooks.
Governments, through their ministries responsible for education, are urged to develop strategies, policies and plans which implement the principles of this Manifesto. Plans should include the dissemination of the Manifesto to initial and continuing training programmes for librarians and teachers.
But tonight as I was talking about the day with the girls, Sofie said the absolute best part was climbing trees with her friends. It was all part of practicing for being firemen when they are grown up apparently.
Wanna know who wasn't happy?
If I were to schedule my entire life on this thing, it would need to be much larger.
In the meantime you can help me decide which sandals to buy. The choice is between a pair from New Look (top) or Zara (bottom) and no I can't get both! Please leave your vote int he comments box as I seem to be inept at adding a voting button below!
FFA members worked hard decorating and preparing the meal for Harvestfest. They even organized a game of musical chairs for everyone involved. The results of the first-time event were overwhelmingly successful, both for Springport FFA and for the community at large.
Warner Bros. Records – WB 56 806, 1980.
WHAT?!!! Are you NUTS? What are they giving you? ... because it MUST be better than what they're giving me. They just operated on that leg the day before yesterday.
One of the busiest poets in Canada is Dwayne Morgan. A longtime fixture of the local scene, Dwayne has been organizing shows and performing in schools and community for nearly 20 years (including The Roots Lounge Canadian Indies Qualifier Tuesday, February 7 at 8pm inside Harlem Restaurant at 57 Richmond St. E.). His career has been filled with accolades, including a Harry Jerome Award and several Urban Music Association of Canada Awards for Best Spoken Word Recording, and he has produced several published volumes and CD recordings of his work.
Twine from the Twinery in Cappuccino
One of the favourite beers from the night was the self-proclaimed world's first breakfast beer, aptly named "Breakfast Beer" which a lot of people described as having the flavour and aroma of an alcoholic Creamy Soda which was a fitting description for this gorgeous fruity lambic.
But there are still days that walk/running 4 miles feels like I am creeping along. I managed a 13 min/mile pace yesterday, which is awesome for me. But by God I felt like I was barely moving some of that time.
+ we have harvested two baskets full of wild blackberries behind our home. many more harvest await as the fruit slowly ripens. blackberries in may? yes!
Isn't it amazing that we have a day just to celebrate preserving memories? Scrapbooking really is the perfect combination of creativity and history, and I don't do enough of it. The stamp set that I have chosen to showcase today is That's Punnylicious:
Of course, it was the mention of God changing said woman’s life that intrigued me, though I intended on reading it anyway. Being, for better or for worse, partial to religion I decided to pick it up and open the first page. I perhaps shouldn’t have done this at the bus stop, because suffice to say from the opening two paragraphs, I was hooked:
Steve Hillage- Sea Nature
So, tell me, do you like it? I know I have been making a lot of these stick pins again lately, but I just can't get enough of them. They are addicting and with all of the supplies I bought over the past year or so, I will be making stick pins forever ;D;D.
A strong sun block and eye and nose drops can alleviate the others. Long-term studies have shown no negative effects to eye function of individuals undergoing light therapy treatment.
If we take the example, often attributed to learning a musical instrument or other highly demanding skill, and transfer it to the importance of play, we can say it takes 10,000 hours of open-ended and undirected play to begin to learn how to manage risk, develop skills in problem-solving and make sense of the world. It’s a good idea to have children able to know if they truly can manage for themselves, or need to go for help, before they naturally begin to break away from their parents at around age nine. 10,000 hours over nine years is just over 3 hours a day or 21 hours a week. It doesn’t sound a lot until we work out how much time is spent doing other things – some of it essential, much of it stolen by adults – sleeping; eating; listening to stories; being involved in family rituals; personal hygiene; times in transit; formal activities and school; chores; adult directed play and so on.
The state political class obviously did not recognize these problems ahead of rolling out the program since within a year or so, the program had already cost Pennsylvania state taxpayers over one million dollars. Not only is the program severely cash negative already, the program never attained its original objective of having 100 vending machines up and running by now. Only 32 every got installed, which may be a good thing.
Thank you all for your prayers. They are working, and it is clear that God is continuing to work in Levi's little body. We are loving the happy playful times with him, and are "cautiously excited" that maybe we'll all get to be back home together as a family for a few days very soon before he starts his second round of chemo.
after Father Murphy personally wrote to Cardinal Ratzinger protesting that he should not be put on trial because he had already repented and was in poor health and that the case was beyond the church’s own statute of limitations.
Just exactly
The notion being, if we can bring some excitement to beer for one week of the year, and by extension bring excitement to the places that serve that beer, we would have a mission accomplished. It’s been going fantastically since then, especially with the inclusion of events.” Schaffner notes that since the first year the Passport concept has been an essential addition to the program. “A large part of that is a production of the passport. The passport allows people to appreciate beers at different venues on their own during the week. The passport is something we think is very important. It allows people to have a long-standing connection not just with the beer week. When people come to visit they will bring their passports and use it as a resource guide to find of the best places to drink beer in that city. This year there were parts of the passport that were actually available for use year-round. Next year we hope to have even more of that.”
*A new benign form of capitalism will emerge during 2017-2020.
Ok, I know I’m blowing all of this way out of proportion. It’s just a pair of freaking pants. But, obivously it goes a bit deeper than that. In fact, I suspect that we all have those outfits in our closets that we are terrified of wearing, even though we really want to. I can’t be the only one. Maybe we can all find a day to wear these outfits together. Safety in numbers. Perhaps then the reviews will say ”Ms. J and friends found a rare form of fashion courage today and dared to wear the outfits of their dreams. The sight of so many gorgeous people in all shapes and sizes was awe-inspiring, especially Ms. J herself as she confidently wore her new black leather boots and a pair of jeggings.”
Performance schedule at Queens Theatre is as follows: December 27th through 31st, Tuesday through Saturday, 2 PM and 7 PM daily. Tickets are priced at $32, with a special family 4-pack for $100. Box office number for information and tickets is 718 760-0064. www.queenstheatre.org.
03) New York State Police
Life is a bit of a whirlwind here these days between the holidays, the be-here-before-you-know-it wedding, and the fact that my son has purchased a house and will be moving out in the next few weeks, well after a bit of painting and fluffing by me... of course! And I suppose a bit of hammering and sawing by some others...
The fourth and final season of Zero no Tsukaima is on, and it promises to be decent from the starting gate. If you haven’t seen any of this show, I suggest you start from the beginning, there is far too much to go over for a proper synopsis, but the basics are Louise Françoise Le Blanc de La Vallière (Kugimiya Rie) is a magician-in-training at Tristain Academy of Magic in Tristain, a small country bordering many other larger, powerful countries in another world. Along with classmates Charlotte Helene “Tabitha” Orléans (Inokuchi Yuka) and Kirche Augusta Frederica von Anhalt Zerbst (Inoue Nanako) and others, she aims to be a great magician and serve her country, headed by Queen Henrietta de Tristain (Kawasumi Ayako). During the Familiar Summon Ritual, Louise summons a boy from Tokyo, Japan to their world named Saito Hiraga (Hino Satoshi) through some bizzare circumstance. Without a way to return home, and bearing a strange inscription on his hand, Saito reluctantly agrees to help Louise despite being treated like a pet dog rather than a person. Joined in the second season by Tifania “Tifa” Westwood (Noto Mamiko) who saved Saito’s life, the team continues to train at the academy and take on the region’s complex and controversial problems that threaten everyone’s safety and security.
I have seen an increasing level of distaste for the Disney Princesses–many look at the princesses and say that they teach girls that physical beauty is the only thing that matters and that women have no power at their disposal outside their sexuality. I would like to argue. Despite the fact that most of these films are based on stories by the Grimm brothers (who did not seem to have a high opinion of women, primarily because of the view of women in their time), Disney managed to give their princesses varied personalities. Many of the princesses were strong characters who overcame adversity. Disney walked a very thin line of staying true to the stories while giving the princesses character and strength.
I hope they live long enough to when I have time for them or I live to have time for them. Then again, Jamie didn’t make it to see the people in his photos – the people who were the most important part of his life. Maybe I should make time right now.
what if
These food items are sold by Aimee in Dalaran, located outside the city’s north bank (Horde side).
Then came a song that I flat out didn’t recognize. As I fumbled laboriously through the verse, I was more than publicly embarrassed, I was acutely aware of the smug whispers of those talkers in the crowd. At that moment I wanted to stop singing and walk away; it’s the same feeling you get when you’re talking to someone who is so unenjoyable that you’re consciously offended during the conversation instead of in hindsight. I felt my face flushing red but I kept going. I was singing karaoke to a song I’ve never heard before. Soon the song became so ridiculously complicated that I just stood there swaying stupidly as the crowd gawked.
The mayor commissioned the consultant’s study after the city’s horrendous nonresponse to the 2010 Christmas blizzard. The goal was to ensure that emergency services were operating at peak efficiency and coordination.
"We don't remember days, we remember moments"
We can do better, we know it. I may not get a kitchen that beautiful , but I'm glad we aren't settling. . .because with this house (as much potential as it had), we would be settling.
*if you have to wait for it to roar out of then wait patiently. if it never does roar out of you, do something else. if you first have to read it to your wife or your girlfriend or your boyfriend or your parents or to anybody at all, you're not ready. don't be like so many writers, don't be like so many thousands of people who call themselves writers, don't be dull and boring and pretentious, don't be consumed with self- love. the libraries of the world have yawned themselves to sleep over your kind. don't add to that. don't do it. unless it comes out of your soul like a rocket, unless being still would drive you to madness or suicide or murder, don't do it. unless the sun inside you is burning your gut, don't do it. when it is truly time, and if you have been chosen, it will do it by itself and it will keep on doing it until you die or it dies in you. there is no other way.
Hope your Holidays are Merry & Bright!!
For a full list of shipping restrictions at a specific DOS address, please contact the DOS facilities staff at that location or review the DOS restrictions beginning on page 26 here: http://www.state.gov/documents/organization/88704.pdf
The overall purpose, by the way, is to challenge accuracy and completeness of thinking in a way that acts to move people towards their ultimate goal.
thinking about your sweet smile
Wynkoop Brewing Company Sleggehammer
thanks for your hugely positve letter, I believe your wrong but I’m unsure how I can explain the situation any clearer than I already have. Perhaps a stick diagram would be suffecient for your level of inteligence?
You were born to live with the most powerful purpose in the existence. You were born to be filled with the Energy of Goodness that changes your life in and out and brings success into every area of your life. It automatically blesses your family and your business and all of your motions and movements. The question is: are you focused on it? Do you want it? Or maybe you want to live life in a very meaningless way that has no direction. This kind of lifestyle would prove that you as a human being have no choice over your life but the force of Energy of Evil directs you to destruction. But you have been created with a large and I should say unlimited capacity of choice and power with which you can fully control your life and even control other lives through your inspirational moves. So be focused on having that inner relationship with the energy of Goodness that will give you power to overcome any challenges and make you a winner in your family, business, and overall purpose of your life.
Rémy: First of all I'm sorry about my poor english, I only hope that English speaking people won't lose their eyes. I began painting minis 9 years ago I think... In fact with the first release of the french magazine "Ravage" , maybe with white dwarf 89. For the sculpting process it began with my big diorama, "le serment du Graal", 2004.
But passionately seeking justice is just one step away from vengeance. And Scripture tells us not to take revenge into our own hands. Romans 12:19. Instead, we should leave room for God’s wrath, not trying to overcome evil with evil but overcoming evil with good. Romans 12:20-21.
The shower job is a hindrance because it is not something we are qualified to do. We could probably give it a jolly good go, but quite frankly, something that is going to live forever behind a tiled wall/stone shower floor, we want doing right.
But that's it. Tomorrow evening, we're heading to Hyderabad for the weekend and then it's off to Delhi for ten days to study religion. Time REALLY flies when you're going around India for a month.
In April my good friend Jackie Butler of Petalsweet in San Diego, California will be teaching us her fabulous sugarpaste flowers and how she creates those amazing romantic sugar vase arrangements.
-And last but not least, they get millions of dollars to broadcast your wedding on national television and then break up with you through twitter.
From his lips saliva dripped.
And, just because the amazing Kasmira requested it, here is a video I helped some friends make. I actually won an acting award for this. In the words of my sister: "No fucking way."
No more pics right now. I am in California, living with my parents, while Bryce is home, working on the kitchen. I'm here with the boys for the month and Bryce will join us for Christmas. It's tough being here without Bryce...the boys are still adjusting, but in the long run, I think it will be best for the boys to be away from the craziness of the remodel. I'm looking forward to coming home to a kitchen that is almost done!
The Super-Luminal UFOs of a Mystique Congregation Bringing the First Light to Conquer Time and Eternity (Superfluid Micrograviton Centrifuge)
information required to carry out complex cognitive tasks such as learning, reasoning, and comprehension. Basically, working memory is the holding tank for important information. Students are using the information for a bigger task. For example, students might remember the list of supplies that they need to work on a poster that reviews a chapter from the textbook. They understand the textbook chapter, but their working memory is thinking glue, poster board, five key dates from the chapter, and five definitions. Their working memory remembers what it needs to remember. It will probably forget the list when it begins focusing on the actual information.
Phemie and Stanley Maxwell are married and first met 21 years ago in China. They were both on vacation at the time. There have been some internal tensions with their relationship surrounding cultural differences; mostly over holidays and sometimes food, but they feel these issues are usually comical in retrospect.
They never would shoot each other.
Here is the theme for this review – simplicity – no bells and whistles. This author service mirrors the UKBookland site, but for all the simplicity, both have two very important things in common – books and community. In my mind, these are the two fundamental bedrocks for the book publishing world today. If your book publishing business does not acknowledge and actively implement these values – you are dead in the water when it comes to the future of publishing and how readers will access books.
I went on up to Bailliehill and was tempted to try to complete a 26 mile circuit but discretion proved the better part of valour and I turned for home after taking a shot of one of my favourite views down the Esk valley.
Bruce Wilson – I have always struggled with paint colours. One time early in my career, I specified a paint colour for a 10,000 square foot office. The colour was fleshy and looked to be the colour of ‘bad nylons’. The electric blue trim colour I chose didn’t help. I walked in for the first time to meet with the client and I tried desperately to hide my alarm. The truth was, they liked it, but I don’t think I ever recovered from that design blunder.
"I don't know if the subways need to be safer, but I don't mind the extra protection," he said, still noting nobody bothered him about two large bags he was hauling around.
I normally mix organic marinara tomato sauce I get from Trader Joe's and add some tomato paste to it so that the sauce is not too runny, I don't like wet pizzas.
With two months til James turned one, I was really hoping to lose those last 10 pounds. But although my weight was coming down, I really needed to tone up. My arms were actually pretty strong (I think from lifting a carrying a 20 pound baby around)! I started back up with the trainer (still only once or twice a week) and she stressed that I really needed to be doing my cardio and start eating more often (I’d gotten into a habit of eating only breakfast, a light lunch, having a Starbucks in the afternoon and then a not-so-great dinner).
This threat is not a short-term threat but extends over several decades. Of the 27 “Grand Minima’s” that have occurred over the past 12,000 years: 30% lasted less than 50 years, 52% lasted between 50 and 100 years, and 18% lasted over 100 years. Of these, the longest was Spörer Minimum, which lasted approximately 150 years.
A state of mind. How often do we labour under the false notion that it takes another to make us happy. Sure there are people who do. People who fill our hearts with joy and add to our happiness. But at the end of the day, it remains a state of mind. One that we adopt consciously. Willingly. Embrace Happiness and life will embrace you…
B21
These seven amazing kids worked hard to create a movie trailer based on a movie of their creation. They had to write a script, make costumes, build props, solve problems and overcome challenges as they showcased poise, teamwork, ingenuity and creativity. Their final performance could be no more than 4 minutes long.
The Winter’s Tale (and nothing else ever, no nothing, nothing at all) – Hermione – Greek, “messenger” or “earthly” or “travel” or “something else related to Hermes” – I can’t actually name a child this. No one can pronounce Hermione on the first go-around, and Hermione of myth and plays does not, in my estimation, have the happiest of lots. But it’s an awfully pretty name when said correctly.
The student would like to travel after her degree. It is one which could lead to work anywhere.
Chess and critical thinking skills for girls supported by the Carnegie Science Center and the Braincake initiative.
My feelings are still torn, scattered and askew.
OK lets begin! Using 2 strands of wool (if you're using a bendigo 200g ball then pull out the end of the wool from the centre of the ball and you'll be using both ends of the ball).
It amazes me what the power of hope can do for one's soul.
Within the agni sUkta of a RSI, you have his mantras in gAyatrI chandas first, then triSTup, then jagatI and others. The sUktAs with smaller number of mantrAs like 3, 4, 5 and 6 come first, followed by the longer sUktAs.
I wasn't going anywhere.
2. INSTANT Ghost wolf indoors: only for baddies who have issues getting out of fire?
Oh, damn it. I hated the fact he was right.
After a nice lunch we headed to the Theresienwiese on the bahn. A man asked me if it was my first time and when I said yes he replied "you'll never forget it". Amen. We exited off the train in a crush of people all heading up the escalators towards the light finding ourselves face to face with the huge fairgrounds and approximately 300-400k people. Holy hell!! I think we were all in shock for a minute. We walked around trying to take it all in but it was impossible and completely mind boggling.
How does he know that the person who wrote the article is a unionist or even cares about the union?
It is now in London, and I was stupid enough to believe that I could go and see it whenever I wanted. But all advance tickets are sold, and the website warns that the queues may be three hours long. For someone who has queued twelve hours to run past Mona Lisa it doesn't sound too bad. My childhood friend is coming to visit next week, and I think we'll go to see Lady with an Ermine. We usually chat aroung the clock when we meet, so we can just as well chat while we queue.
For dreams beached on the sand like dying whale.
This morning, he leaves early, like the first morning. She takes me outside shortly after that. We walk a little more than usual. Then back inside and she feeds me.
And here is the east garden, the strawberry patch, also untouched since last year.
BTW, one more tid bit of exciting news: I have been selected to be on a design team for the very FIRST time for Stamptacular Sundy Challanges! My duties begin April 1, so I hope you will plan to come and check out my designs and join in on the challanges!
I am so super excited to have some Kombucha and Water Kefir fermenting in my kitchen right now. My friend Nicole of A Life Well Nourished, gave me a Scoby starter for Kombucha and asked me to babysit her Water Kefir grains for a week. She said they would store just fine in the refridgerator, but this gives me a good chance to try making both for a bit. Both drinks are a bit sour, a bit sweet, naturally carbonated and full of vitamins and probiotics. Eating and drinking fermented foods is part of being healthy and eating nourishing foods. I also have my first fermented food, a pear chutney, fermenting on my counter. I can't wait to share all of my fun and tasty experiments with everyone. Fermenting is an artisan experience. Each batch is slightly different and things take time, life slows down. I won't get to taste my first batch of kombucha for over a week. My pear chutney will take about a month, maybe longer before it mellows and is tasty. The kefir is "quick" only taking about 48 hours from start to finish.
String and a Straw
Last month after great success and completion for their first Japan showcase, on the 8th their performed single album ‘Genie’ rose to the top 5 in the Oricon chart. Debut albums usually do not usually climb to the top 5 on the Oricon chart on the release day.
This week's theme is Delicate, and I wracked my brain all week for inspiration - which in hind sight seems contradictory. However, while grocery shopping (a chore I detest), I was struck by inspiration, and decided that the delicate nature of life was what I wanted to portray. The delicate balance we all walk between living and dead, and how we choose to honor that (or not) each and every day.
However, an interpretation by the state Department of Revenue (DOR) changes the procedure slightly. Typically, grandparents write a check at birthdays and other occasions, adding the gift to an existing savings account the parent owns. They could then take the Wisconsin deduction, independently of what the parent could deduct. In a recent statement, DOR now says the grandparent has to own a separate account to take the state tax deduction.
From April 27 to May 14 this year, we took Liam on an 18-day trip to parts of Germany and Austria, with a short two-day excursion to Prague thrown into the mix. Add to that my parents, my brother and his wife, and my sister. Modes of transport: planes, trains, and automobiles. Keeping in mind that Liam had not yet turned one during that time, this was was a suicide mission, particularly because both my wife and I had a pretty good idea how things would turn out, given that Liam isn’t exactly the easiest kid in the world—he’s not the worst, but he’s no angel either—and the rest of my family is, well, my family. We’ve traveled with them before (minus Liam), so we at least have some idea of what to expect.
Eilis Boyle black dress and cream sash, Bow Boutique €420; €50
peep what else I post on the intergalactic, I mean interweb, I mean internet:
4) Oh yeah, and the muscle relaxers ... All I have to say is, I'd make a funny drunk. That stuff had me laughing up a storm for no reason the first time I took it. I decided to wait to swallow it until the last minute before I went to bed. Good thing, too, because it works pretty quickly. Dill and I were just chatting in bed when I suddenly developed a mad case of the giggles. I was hysterical yet fully aware of the fact I had absolutely nothing to laugh about. It was like one part of my brain was saying, "Go to sleep! Calm the flip down! You're embarrassing me ..." and the other side was like, "But it's just SO. FUNNAY when your legs feel like Jell-O! Wa-HOOOOOOO!!!!!1!!1
xx Clare
If you think back a few months ago, Fernando Torres, Chelsea’s striker, experienced the same slump. He went months without scoring a goal. Fortunately, the no goal streak has come to an end. In his last game against the Queen Park Rangers he scored his first hat trick in two and a half years. Although he helped Chelsea seal the 6-1 victory, he believes that he still needs to improve. He feels as though his performance was better when he was not scoring. “I am very happy with three (goals), hopefully the first of many, but the more important thing for me is the team looks like they are playing their best football of the season with important games to come.” This shows that Torres is aware that he is part of a team and there is no perfect soccer player. Even though he is scoring goals his job is not done. Chelsea needs to win the rest of their games this season in order to make the top four. Both Torres and De Rosario realize that soccer is not an individual sport and that it takes all eleven players on the field to work hard and contribute whether they are the ones scoring or not.
Imagine a golf course deliberately aligned with the universe! You study astronomy with a putter in your hand, hiking amidst coincidence like some strange god on a midwestern hillside.
I am going now… But I will be back tomorrow.
Thanks Fergus, thanks Sam, and thanks Mitch and everyone else. From my hazy recollection of aged beers and bar billiards, I think the night got even better after the dishes were cleared away.
Whorton D, D Foliart D. DBCP: Eleven Years Later. Symposium on the Assessment of Reproductive Hazards in the Workplace. Cincinnati, Ohio. Presentation June 16, 1988.
Oh, and this: You try selling something better to the United States Government.
This little girl speaks! "Da da da da da da dadadada". "Ahhhhhhh GAH!" "Ay yah yah yah ahhh da!" She has opinions and she wants you to know them!
And now a poll, for your entertainment and my own interest’s sake.
The wife was not amused.
I can’t help but feel cheated by the American Dream we all have grown up with. The “you can be anything you want to be in America.” We preach independence, count on being able to exercise it, and have such an individualistic society that living at home with your parents for a certain amount of time starts to grate on you and your own sense of self and accomplishment. I’m working the type of job I would have worked in high school (in fact, most people I work with seem to think I’m a senior in high school, but that’s another story), yet I’m college-educated and have enough of the skills required to perform well at a job that’s actually going to use what I have to offer. I’m trying my hardest to find avenues to either land me jobs or freelance opportunities, but I feel like I keep hitting dead ends or delays. I’m angry that our economy and country is so messed up that companies are using tactics like requiring your Facebook password in order for you to be hired and disregarding tons of applicants simply because of the number of applications. The political climate and legislation and idiotic squabbling going on over the economy, budget, and where this country is going is not helping anyone, other than the super-rich that are sitting comfortably while everyone else suffers from pay cuts, insurance worries, debt, or unemployment. I’d like to know where the America I knew just ten years ago went, or at least rest assured that I’ve been wearing rose-colored glasses all these years, and that I’m going to have to find my avenue to success and stability in a very unconventional way.
Passing through the Peak District the weather closed in, sleet skitted along the train's windows and we looked out over the snowy hills with their tops shrouded in icy clouds – that's a real winter landscape!
It’s fascinating because Obama actually does have a son who turned two years old today – and he’s running from that kid as if it had flesh-eating disease:
Well, I’m in the embroidery business. I work for a small sports shop in Miami that embroiders sportswear for local high schools and universities. I’ve been working there for over 15 years and am extremely happy with what I do. It’s a nice creative outlet. I’m also a mother to three children turned adults, a wife (married for 30 years), a daughter, sister and grandma. In my free time, I like to scour the internet for new crafty ideas and finish the projects I have already started.
Birthday Parties- I am a party host at a local pre-school that handles bday parties on weekends. I have a time slot on saturday afternoons and am available sundays to them when I am not working at the library. For me, this really isn't a very difficult job and when I do have one, the extra income is nice to have.
Thanks for visiting ReMadeSimple today! I hope you come back again soon for these giveaways and more frugal DIY projects and a few recipes coming that you won't want to miss!
Ok, so I’m very curious about living a green life as well as the green economy and found a fun way to learn…. I’m going to host a green economy part (after classes have ended of course)…. I can learn to educate others about living a greener life and the power of solar business….. anyway Green For All has a pretty cool resource page which includes a guide for planing a green economy party (http://www.greenforall.org/resources/host-a-green-economy-house-party). Well I’ll try mines this summer… maybe around my green garden (I know so corny)… but I’m determined to help my community as much as I can……
"Maybe it was my reading diet as a child, maybe it's just the way I am but my writing always comes out a little bit... dark." - Jon Mayhew
Earrings: Baccarat
What was your bottle-feeding experience? Overall it was good, although we had to switch to a soy formula due to gas.
and forever will be.
16. Entrance (prod. by Ekcel Beats)
I learned a baked potato doesn’t need to have a pound of butter and sour cream to be good. Plain old salt works too. And I rediscovered a love for baked sweet potatoes. But I’m definitely passing on the plain broccoli without cheese now that the fast is over. That’s one taste I did not acquire.
green chillies - 2 large
1 tablespoon active dry yeast
The president listened to that little voice in his ear that keeps repeating 'elections coming up' and
* Use a tape measure and make sure each of your folds are equal.
In a large bowl, stir together dry Knodel mix, chives, and garlic pepper. Next, stir in 3 cups of water. Wait for dough to thicken- about 5-10 minutes. Roll into 3 inch balls. Cook according to directions (usually, boil about 20 minutes).
"Yep, right there. There's a Dick's."
Alors ce va-nu-pieds songea dans sa mansarde,
"The Thinking Machine Investigates"
Other things absolutely should be promised.
The part of the seed known as the kola nut is the cotyledon, which is also called the seed leaf. The cotyledons are white and bitter when they are fresh, but they turn reddish with almost no taste when they are dried.
All rights retained by original copyright holder
The contest would stay pretty tight throughout the 2nd-Q, as our bench was shooting well, and the Kings' crowd was feeding their high intensity. It's hard to believe this team hasn't won more than 20 games, actually. Both teams were seeminlgy scoring at will near the end of the half, as Tiago, Jack, and Mills were leading our charge, but Isaiah Thomas and DeMarcus Cousins were surely responding. Halftime: 58-57, Spurs.
Many of President Obama’s fervent devotees are young enough not to have much memory of the political world before the arrival of The One. Coincidentally, Obama himself feels the same way—and the White House’s official website reflects that.
1 golden beet with greens
A great tip: Chia seed! They are packed with more protein than eggs and higher levels of omegas 3,6, and 9. These seeds swell with water so they are perfect for long lasting hydration if taken with a glass of water, they also are a great appetite suppressant.
He was, of course, a prime rallying point for New Atheism, but he was so much more than that. He was the Orwell of our time: polymathic, eloquent, able to say something interesting about nearly everything, and deeply opposed to all forms of totalitarianism. He loved literature and was able to write interesting things about it. It is a real feat, for instance, to be able to write so enthusiastically about Anthony Powell’s novel A Dance to the Music of Time that a scientist like me would procure it and read every volume of this multi-book treatment of English life.
For this first part I'm going to be looking at basics such as furniture, room restoration, storage space and bedding. The second part will focus more on details such as displays and decorations, visual items that will loli your room rather than your room speaking for itself without these materials. These posts are going to be split up as otherwise we might end up with a huge post! Hopefully by the end of this you'll be a bit more inspired to have a go at something yourself or even just go out and find something pretty to add to your bedroom, now let's start...*ahem*
DO
Satisfied she tucked her dagger into the waistband of her jeans and pulled her hoodie over it. However, she couldn’t shake the feeling that she was being watched. She hurried out of the alley and turned back onto the sidewalk.
Gwent seems to be hinting…
I am now reading from 2 Corinthians 3:1-2. “Do we begin again to commend ourselves? Or need we, as some others, epistles of commendation to you, or letters of commendation from you? Ye are our epistle written in our hearts, known and read of all men.” Every person saved is a testimony of Paul’s gospel but all too many are silent testimonies or perhaps false witnesses.
It was only after the atomic bomb was dropped on Hiroshima, Japan in 1945 that many of the workers realized what they had been working on. Oak Ridge is no longer a military town, and only has a population of about 27,000. Efforts are currently underway to revitalize and preserve Jackson Square.
I am aware, that many object to the severity of my language; but is there not cause for severity? I will be as harsh as the truth, and as uncompromising as justice. On this subject, I do not wish to think, or speak, or write with moderation. No! no! Tell a man whose house is on fire, to give moderate alarm; tell him to moderately rescue his wife from the hands of the ravisher; tell the mother to gradually extricate her babe from the fire into which it has fallen; –but urge me not to use moderation in a cause like the present. I am in earnest–I will not equivocate–I will not excuse–I will not retreat a single inch–AND I WILL BE HEARD.
The second one is 'Raining Hearts Tilda'..
Yes, I disagree with Douthat (and the Catholic Church) on the issues of birth control, women’s ordination, gay marriage, and priestly celibacy, but I don’t know that he would say that I (as an urban twenty-something going to credal/confessional a Dutch Reformed Church in the middle of the city) am not living out his hope for the direction of American Christianity–even as we disagree on these points. In fact, as he signed my book last night, I told him my ecclesial affiliation, and he seemed to love it.
Among the stores vandalized: Debeers, Longchamp, Prada, Armani, Tumi, Guess and Montblanc.
‘Did ye never hear yon sound afore?’ said Osie to me, interrupting.
Tiresias, the blind man who could see into the future, and who lived both as a man and a woman
Price: $13.50
MAIN EVENT- TAG TEAM #1 CONTENDER’S MATCH
The princess skipped carelessly through the fields, tossing the golden ball into the air only to watch it shine against the sun. Suddenly, the princess stumbled over a stray branch and the ball flew into the air, landing with a large plop! into the koi pond nearby. The princess gasped and ran towards the pond, only to see her precious new toy sinking to the bottom of the waters. Koi swam about, frenzied by the sudden movement, and so the princess lost sight of the golden ball. The princess sat on the edge of the pond and wept over her lost possession. Her tears fell onto the stone wall of the pond, dripping over the edge and waking a small black dragon napping in the grass. Noticing the beautiful princess and her tears, the dragon smiled slyly and crept up onto the wall.
It is quite important to note here that there are ones who have grown quite acutely aware of these finer inner senses and the correlating energies that are behind them, but who choose to use these same energies for very selfish purposes, and manipulate others who are less aware of same. These would be the Lucifers and Satans of biblical legend. These entities are a very real aspect of your experience, just as are the Christed ones who have progressed very far down the same spiritual path that you are now on.
The one constant is the voice saying "What's the point?"
Yakima Rye IPA bomber bottles to go, at only $7.75 each, or $90.00 a case (all day Saturday).
Each GlenHeights home has two bedrooms and two bathrooms and is particularly spacious! All countertops, including the bathroom and kitchen, are either granite or quartz. Both the main bathroom, ensuite and laundry areas are tiled with imported, ceramic tiles and the contemporary fire bed and mantle in the living room create a warm ambiance. There are three designer-selected interior colour schemes to choose from and you’ll receive a six piece, Energy Star, stainless steel appliance package including ceramic top range, dishwasher, fridge with freezer, combination microwave hood-fan and stacking washer/dryer. Be sure to check out the designer flooring and architectural trim too, it’s gorgeous!
in a prisoner swap exchanging Alan Gross for members of the so-called
Rowing in a Red boat and there also still is Return and Regularly.
Do we need business to get the economy back on track? Certainly. But that doesn't mean that businesses should be the only focus, because we need to remember that the same people that are now suppose to help us crawl out of the mired economic situation, are the very people that caused it in the first place. Therefore, I think it would be better for the president to be tough on business, by telling them that he supports businesses expanding, creating and exporting more goods, and hiring more employees, but at the same time they're not going to get a free ride (we need industry regulations), and they should not be receiving such huge tax benefits for their efforts, when we're in the current situation because of their practices.
1/4 tsp ground black pepper
They don’t write lines like that anymore. Nabbing the bad guy was never enough for McGarrett – he always had to make an apt final remark to reinforce the moral of the story. “How many rights would a suspect have under a Nazi regime?” is the entirely valid point he was making. I bet any watching neo-Nazis must have felt like utter chumps.
In addition, allopathic physicians became much more organized and came to wield considerable political clout. Naturopathy has experienced a resurgence over the last 20 years, however. The lay public is aware of the connections between a healthful diet and lifestyle and avoiding chronic disease.
And then I remembered that the minister here is an avid gardener who loves windchimes.
Total geek. I won’t deny it. Geek and proud.
produce results, it’s got to be based on God’s Word.
Other than that, things are mostly just annoying. Like, I can't find my Harry Potter clothes. Or, I can find some things, but I can't find other things, and most of the things that I do find don't fit. But, I'm not quite ready to give up on the idea. I still have my scarves if nothing else works.
Rendezvous beginning November - will be interesting to see what the Ortho guy has to say!
I saw this idea in the December 2011 issue of Garden Gate magazine …
Whether the responsibility is to change or organisation websites for circumstantial organizations, customised programming staleness be involved. No two organizations bang the synoptical needs and requirements; thus their organisation and developments would be also polar. Their utilization and decoration touch are finished through tariff programing. Now, you can translate the grandness of it. There are different planning languages equal PHP, ASP, ASP.Net, Potable along with numerous others which are utilised to modify websites, web applications as comfortably as software. Suchlike developments, there are varied software and tools are lendable for web designing complex equivalent Photoshop, Dreamweaver, Instant along with galore others.
Alcohol by volume: 5.7%
Validation Summary: Display a summary of validation errors.
As a quick update the two new swarm hives appear to be making it. So far. Just in case you're interested :)
WHAT I DIDN’T SO MUCH…:
These cute vases with a few sprigs of berries and greenery, decorate the dining room table. I wanted something simple so that we wouldn't have trouble talking to each other when we have our Christmas dinner.
255 2. “The Founders of Our Founders: Jerusalem, Athens, and the American Constitution.” Harry V. Jaffa, ed., Original Intent and the Framers of the Constitution: A Disputed Question (Washington, D.C.: Regnery Gateway, 1994), pp. 181-97, 231-32. (Sources: Item C-1987(3), above, pp. 528-45, Item D-X/8/1976, below.)
f) Meet our new ACS Staff Partner "YOLANDA VAN DYKE" she will knock your socks off with all of the enthusiasm and energy she brings
Julius Ceasar
Hi Paper Lovers...
“Oh wow, you’re so pretty! I think I love you, just because you’re so pretty!”
McBride was convicted of the Magoo’s bar bombing, and sentenced to death. However, lady luck was on his side as the South African government had declared a moratorium on capital punishment in 1990. Then suddenly another man, on the other end of the political spectrum, appeared on the scene -- namely, Barend Strydom (aka Wit Wolf) who was convicted of eight counts of murder, and who was also sentenced to death. Both men, together with 150 other political prisoners, were eventually released from jail after a deal between FW de Klerk’s National Party government and the ANC in 1992. The TRC subsequently granted both men amnesty for their crimes. --- See also: McBride’s Irish-Boer Connection below.
Just had to get that out there into the world.
One of today’s waiters was especially keen to chat with us and practise his English. He told us he likes people from London and the way all of them — from truckers to tourists — say “Alright mate?” Which he did for us in the most authentic ‘sarf’ London accent you can imagine! He was very pleased when we told him his accent was perfect.
No one ever pretended to explain to me how algebra would be applicable to real life, yet no one, even me, ever doubted that there was value in studying it. We chuckle at the Fran Lebowitz joke, because for most of us it's true, but we never once consider stripping algebra from our school curricula.
While this book is excellent and I think everyone should read it, I will say that it's probably better to wait until a sequel is out for this one. While Shades of Grey doesn't end on a cliffhanger, there are enough unresolved issues at the end to have made me incredibly frustrated.
Take the case of the ivory-bill. The article in Science has never been retracted. Cornell still stands by its video. The federal Fish and Wildlife Service acted as though the ivory-bill existed, and, in 2008, it asked for $27 million to support recovery efforts. Here’s the thing: The ivory-billed woodpecker is the Schrödinger’s cat of contemporary media — dead to those who’ve looked inside Tom Nelson’s blog but alive to the professionals who can’t bear to.
Sorry seems to be the Hardest Word
Especially me, I learnt the hard way but it was probably just written in my road (meaning it just was meant to be).
The tomb of Jesus was continually guarded. It was closed with a 2,000 pound stone making it impossible for even a healthy man to open it from the inside. We know that a soldier would never take a body down unless the person was dead. If he did and the prisoner escaped the soldier would be subject to a penalty of death. We also know that when the soldier pierced Christ’s body there was a flow of water and blood, which is a clear indication that there was a separation of clot and serum, which is strong medical evidence of death.
So, it's been a little while. I have lots of good excuses though! In the past year I've moved three times (once across the country), become a full-time student, and a become an aunt to an unbearably cute 2-month-old who lives only a mile away from me (daughter to Naomi, who had just found out she was pregnant when we made this ravioli).
the scars are both visible and invisible. it will take time, i guess.
"so. how are we doin? am i getting out of bed to showr or am i rolling back over to sleep?"
I love you so much,
What do I think of this?
A feature of cooking lager enthusiasm is to share it with your fellow man. Always point out the offers to fellow shoppers. Recently I saw a woman buying a 12 can pack of Carling for £9.99. Next to it was a 24 pack on offer at £10. Not everyone does the maths. An “excuse me, that one’s twice the size and 1p” more usually elicits thanks and gratitude with your fellow shopper and rarely a “mind your own business”. Cooking Lager enthusiasm is an approach of sharing the joy with your fellow man and helping your brothers and sisters get there lovely lout as cheap as you do.
Through 3 immensely painful days I made up my mind to once and for all let go of the pain … To admit I was perhaps the biggest fool ever…
I do have options. I understand that now, at least on some level. It took several years of therapy but I believe I can choose for myself. But knowing the wrath I will face if I choose differently from what he wants is enough to keep me in line way too often.
Another one that they often name is the normal force, though I’ve never had anyone call it that on the first day of the unit. I latch onto someone saying something like “push force” or something to that effect. The best intro I’ve had came when, during the introduction of the previous force, it became clear that there was a large wasp ready to terrorize our classroom. It came down to smashing height, and one of my students (Sterling) crushed it with a binder, much to the delight of everyone on the room. When I asked for the next type of force and it became clear that we were talking about a push force, the kids started calling it the “Force of Sterling”. Quite right.
3. I secretly want all those things I say I don’t. Why? I just know certain things aren’t going to happen for me, so it’s better to not set myself up for disappointment.
Once upon a time, in a great big wood,
The film begins somewhere in Russia, where Ethan Hunt (Cruise) is being held captive in prison. In a different shot, we are shown Benji (Pegg) looking at a computer screen showing a map of the floor that Hunt is on, with access to all cameras and doors within the prison. Of course, with this access, we know that chaos is about to start as Benji opens up one of the cellmates doors, allowing him to wander the corridor freely. This ultimately leads to Hunt’s rescue (mind you, Hunt pretty much rescues himself with the minor assistance of Benji and his ability to unlock doors via computer satellite). Once Hunt is back with his team, they head out on their mission to recover stolen papers involving plans for a nuclear bomb which could lead to nuclear war. Hunt’s team must now find the Russian terrorist, Hendricks (Michael Nyqvist), who has plans to bomb America after having gaining access to these papers. After a bombing of the Kremlin, (a failed attempt of Hunt’s team to catch Hendricks), the President calls for Ghost Protocol, as it is assumed that the IMF was the cause, and it is therefore shut down. Hunt’s team is now without any back up or help while fulfilling their mission in a foreign land of preventing a nuclear attack on America. The team travels to Dubai and Mumbai in a chase to stop the Russian terrorist from launching this bomb in hopes to save their fellow Americans back home. Time is close to running out by the time they obtain replicas of the papers and Hunt is left racing, jumping, swinging, and fighting to the very end.
“Maybe you should have paid more attention, then!” Rel snapped. Like it was his fault if the Sherriff’s men had let the thief get away.
While most people celebrate St. Patrick's Day on March 17, where I come from it seems to last longer than Mardi Gras in N'Awlins (coincidentally, that's also taking place right now). Hoboken, New Jersey, where I tend bar, has its parade the first Saturday of March every year, so as not to compete with the mega-parade across the Hudson in Manhattan on the actual St. Patrick's Day. Other communities in New Jersey spread their celebrations out in the interim, creating one thick fog of overindulgence week after week until finally the corned beef and cabbage comes out and everybody is too sick to eat it.
Well, presumably much to their surprise at hearing this, the law was not enough to counteract human nature and the natural corruption of sin. He tells them that your nature is sin, you were born in iniquity just as David said in Psalm 51:4.
Using their evaluative and psychotherapy skills, art therapists choose materials and interventions appropriate to their clients’ needs and design sessions to achieve therapeutic goals and objectives. They use the creative process to help their clients increase insight, cope with stress, work through traumaticexperiences, increase cognitive, memory and neurosensory abilities, improve interpersonal relationships and achieve greater self-fulfillment. Many art therapists draw upon images from resources such as ARAS (Archive for Research in Archetypal Symbolism) to incorporate historical art and symbols into their work with patients. Depending on the state, province, or country, the term “art therapist” may be reserved for those who are professionals trained in both art and therapy and hold a master or doctoral degree in art therapy or certification in art therapy, obtained after a graduate degree in a related field. Other professionals, such as mental health counselors, social workers, psychologists, and play therapists combine art therapy methods with basic psychotherapeutic modalities in their treatment.Assessing elements in artwork can help therapists understand how well a client is in-taking information.
I am not sure what the students will think of my quote handout. I actually found that saying last week after my dear dear friend lost her father. She is strong, brave, and smart. She is amazing. But at a time like that, I just wanted to make sure she remembers that. I think we can all use that reminder when times are tough.
1962- The Hole
However, I do think I will be doing at least some of these workouts on a weekly basis for the foreseeable future. No more 6-night-a-week madness, but something. There are enough different workouts to keep it interesting, and I worked too hard to let myself regress completely.
The leap from editing to writing seems a natural one to me. When I wear an editor’s hat, I enjoy approaching a piece of writing with fresh eyes and making suggestions. Sometimes, the tiniest tweak can make a tremendous impact. As a writer, I understand I can’t complete a book without wonderful editors. It’s a team effort that has proven beneficial for generations, and I hope I never have to publish a book without a savvy editor on my side.
"Do I need to go to the hospital tonight? Does he need me there?" I am sober. I haven't had a drink in 15 months. I can drive at 10 pm to a hospital ninety minutes away. The thought crosses my mind quickly. It is the little gift of sobriety that I notice today.
Location: Washington, DC
Why?? Why, again I hear you ask??
Sorry about that! I disappeared. Disappeared under a mountain of phone calls and Stuff To Do and clipping hedges and carting stuff to the charity shop and keeping children alive through an entire half term and then ironing.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees F. Lightly grease 9x9" casserole. Combine all ingredients and pour into dish. Bake 45 minutes or until golden brown.
I bucked this one...decided I wouldn't use it a a technique or trend. But I gave in! It was so easy to create. I simply used my square punch and then cut each square in half...base of triangle to base of triangle and you have your zig zag. It was fun...
Other than extreme partisans or idiots, it should be clear to everyone that there have been failures at every level in dealing with the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, including FEMA and Bush. Mayor Ray "dont-blame-me-for-anything" Nagin and Governor Kathleen "when-and-how-should-I-ask-for-help" Blanco are equally culpable, if not more so.
So back in 1978, Brenda heroically tried to brighten up her basement bunker by flinging needlepoint pillows hither and yon. However, despite their striking dimensional effect, her Dritz® Art mini-pillows proved to be no protection when Commie Santa came to town.
Sweet country girl Kat Collins heads to Los Angeles to make it as an actress. Before she even gets to the city, Kat has picked up a hitchiker named Rhonda who promises her a place to stay as well as a showbiz "in." If this sounds entirely too good to be true, that's because it is! Rhonda's boyfriend Buck is a pornographer, but Kat comes from a planet that has never encountered pornography, so she hitches her star to his Hepatitis C train. While out celebrating with her new friends at an unconvincing biker bar, Kat is abandoned by Rhonda and Buck (who have a fully-clothed yet still very icky sex scene in a bar bathroom) only to get almost-raped by a gang. Fortunately, beefy Good Samaritans Victor (Erik Estrada, suffering from an alarming case of Tight-Pants-Itis) and Dirk (Richard Barathy) are there to save her, and they bring her back to what they wrongly assume is safety at Buck's place. The next day, Kat goes to her first audition, which turns out to be for an adult film (escandalo!) and is arrested for assaulting the crew during her escape from the set. After the world's most efficient trial, Kat is imprisoned--but not before telling her family that she's on a super-secret movie shoot in Mexico.
The part of her brain that controlled her face muscles were damaged. Her once lovely face was now disfigured.
As TVs and smartphone apps take over streaming video and music functions, people will probably play less music from the computer, but that’s a shame, because the web designers are getting better and better at presenting music graphically. Rdio and the new beta of Rhapsody have beautiful web interfaces for hunting finding, playing, sharing and studying music.
I covered my plain bottle with some fabric and tied one of my beautiful clay tags from the lovely Ness at Marley & Lockyer around the neck of the bottle. Looks beautiful, smells beautiful......!
Put the knotweed into a small bowl. Dissolve the salt and sugar in the vinegar and water, add the chile. Pour over the sliced knotweed, till it is covered. It will be ready to eat after half an hour - good for topping banh mi, SE Asian style broths and stews, or for revving up a salad. If you're keeping the pickles longer than for immediate use pack them into a sterilized jar or sealable container instead of an open bowl, and keep in the fridge.
Today marks the 448th anniversary of Shakespeare’s birth. Also known as his birthday, if he lived to be 448.
The second demonstrates a new usage of the product, which will open up whole new markets. Here I've used Arial, which is the other great typeface.
This is the only photo in the show in black and white. On the night, the blue lighting was so extreme that all the band came out looking like smurfs on the screen. I adjusted the images to black and white, not only because they looked better, but also as a nod to Charles Petersons photos of the Seattle music scene in the late eighties and early nineties. One of the things I love about this photograph is the compositional element that the lighting rig offers in the top left corner. Unfortunately this is missing from the 10 by 8 image in the show, my preferred version is this one.
Unfortunately the camera does not do the colours justice, they were lovely opaque blue-green-grey in reality.
That might sound strange, but I am blessed/cursed with the greatest beta reader that a writer could ask for. My wife.
Yemen (Al-Tahrir Square)
Regnans whispered in a leaf rustling voice, “Ah-gaw-pay.”
Not many people know where she lays & that’s just fine with me!
John Merrick, less commonly known as Joseph, his true given name, is far better known still as The Elephant Man. He suffered from what is now believed to be Proteus Syndrome, an affliction that dramatically distorts and disables the human form. Although a dramatization of his life was filmed in 1980 by the surrealist director David Lynch, it is Dr. Treves' careful and kind recollections of his discovery of and subsequent enriching friendship with Mr. Merrick which leaves the strongest imprint of the folly of judging by appearances. It also shows the rewards of suspending such judgment until a measured and patient evaluation can be made.
I should get the negatives out of the way first. The main issue I have with Small Pond is that it's a little bit too festooned with in-jokes for anyone who lives in Columbia. It name-drops local landmarks in the dialogue in most scenes, and some of its shots are framed to do the same thing with what's in the background. I mean, it DOES have a nice sense of place. You do get a feel for what Columbia is like in Small Pond. I found it a little distracting. Not for the first time, I wonder if the people who live in LA feel the same way when they watch movies. More vexing is the fact that our heroine is unlikeable. You watch her give in to her impulses and you want to shake her and shout "What do you think you're doing?" at her. There's a method to this, it turns out, but it's not immediately apparent early in the film: There's a scene early in the film where Kirsten decides to eat some stuffed mushrooms that her roommate set aside that's an example. It reflects badly on Kirsten, depriving her of some measure of sympathy as she does it. Then the whole thing blows up in her face. This scene structure is repeated on a slightly larger scale late in the film, when she has her accident.
1) Sleuth (age, occupation, maybe a little family info)
Council chiefs are wielding the axe at a time when demographic pressures are growing, with the number of people aged over 85 increasing by more than 250,000 in the last six years.
Me : “150!!! are you nuts?”
I can't believe that I stayed till today
My routine mammogram turned out not to be so routine. Something suspicious showed up. I had a few cysts that were aspirated and were not cancerous; however, the biopsy on another suspicious mass turned out to be Cancer. I though how can that be? I feel fine! Thank God I followed up with a mammogram in six months as was recommended and caught it early.
As "the gypsy" was leaving he poured some of his wine on the stump.
Ok....Before i get into the spam and stuff i just want to make a statement really quick....
“In all honesty, the name Boiler Room began life as a working title for 24-7′s first intentional community, in Reading, UK. It was a nickname, and it stuck! It was a name harking back to the great and glorious days of steam, where boiler rooms powered vast machines and systems. In these places, fires were fueled night-and-day, pistons converting pressure into power, and eventually into heat and light for the community. It was only later that we discovered that C.H. Spurgeon, one of the greatest preaches of the late-nineteenth century, attributed the fruitfulness of his entire ministry to something he called ‘Boiler Rooms’. These were prayer meetings – often established in basements – that interceded while Spurgeon preached to crowds of thousands above their heads. Spurgeon considered them the power-source of his own ministry.”
I called the display The Baby Garden ... watch it grow:
Hope we don't find any more features or flaws along the way - hah!
and then the last picture. BUT don't skip to that. because there is something about a girl falling in love with a dolphin involved and i think you would be disappointed if you missed it.
According to Alexa.com, here is info on who is visiting my website the most: "Based on internet averages, triciagoyer.com is visited more frequently by females who are in the age range 25-34, have children, are
Today, we went to Schlitterbahn, the child mecca of the Southwest. Yes, it's a water park, but it is the best waterpark ever. (Todd's suggestion for its new motto: "It's a Schlitload of Fun!") There are three now, but the original, in New Braunfels, TX, is located on the Comal River. The cool part about this place is that it actually uses the cold, clear river water from the Comal in several of the rides, rather than the nasty colored chloriny stuff. Several of the tube chutes actually empty you into the river or take you alongside it. And it's OK to do everything with a beer in your hand.
Authors: Joel Smith and Joanna Silver (Herbert Smith LLP)
1 tsp sesame oil
It's my birthday today!
Trail Miles Completed: 3.7
My family and I are taking a Spring Break trip south to (sunny?) San Diego for a few days…I’m hoping that time away might help me to regain some of my mojo, because another week of this pitiful performance and I’d consider myself to be officially ‘slumping’.
What a bad idea.
Today, I heard the sad news that Thomas Kinkad had passed away at the age of 54. I so admired his love of beauty seen through a believer. I was sad for a minute until a happy thought came to mind, Thomas is now surrounded by all the beauty of our Lord in the company of the Creator of all.
I figured that I would try the changes and when they didn’t work, I could say “well I tried and here’s why it just can’t be written this way.”
Physicians for Compassionate Care Education Foundation promotes the ethic that all human life has inherent value and that physician-assisted suicide:
Happily, no. The Woman in White is just about the best example of a “page-turner” I can drum up. If I were Webster, actually, I’d show a picture of this book in lieu of a verbal definition of “suspense.” So that’s an awful lot of hyperbole, but you feel me. I’ve had more than a few sleepless, “oh-man-it’s-3am-and-I-have-to-work-tomorrow-morning-but-I’m-going-to-read-one-more-chapter-maybe-two” moments. At one point I started having heart palpitations. I might have had to put the book in the freezer.
Even though I've always loved writing, I didn't read much as a teen. I always thought I was too "busy". Even in my early twenties, I always had something else going on. I grew up in a small down (98 kids in my graduating class). The town being so small, everyone knew EVERYONE. I couldn't go go to the store without seeing someone I knew. I talked on the phone a lot. Hung out with my friends often. I worked with a few of my close friends from High School. I was always around someone.
My best friend Tara bought me the Ottolenghi cookbook for my birthday. I am steadily working my way through it and every recipe that I have tried has been a definite winner. It’s all about the flavour and colour which is the kind of food I love. It has a definite Middle Eastern theme, but not solely. There are recipes from all over the world.
Dear Sir/Madam,
“In Our Hearts Forever” meets the first Tuesday of every month from 6:30 to 7:30 p.m. in Riverview Medical Center’s lower level conference center. New members and support persons are always welcome; but the group asks that no children attend. No fee or registration is required. For more information, please email inourheartsforever@gmail.com or visit inourheartsforever@groups.facebook.com.
He's so cute. I love him. The End.
I know I am repeating myself, but I cannot make this point strongly enough: A legitimate movement with a legitimate grievance was illegitimately but legally banned by a politically motivated mayor and a politically motivated court, after which black clad, politicised state enforcers, armed with batons and dogs, arrested and dispersed legitimate demonstrators because they held a differing political viewpoint.
We had a lovely class last night - our May Christmas Stamp A Stack concentrated on the technique of Heat Embossing. In particular, embossing on Vellum card and creating a Faux Patina on Dry Embossed textures.
While I was disappointed I didn't get the job in Paris, like I said before, just getting the interview was exciting and made all my hard work seem worthwhile.
Paris....glistening in the snow....dressed for Christmas.
Well Kostas (my son) had his picture with Santa yesterday so.. i dont know I feel like the time is now..
I said, "Barman, tonight I know hate.
Alaskan Brewing Co. Alaskan Smoked Porter
So, how's everybody holding up?
I decided to make this a bracelet kit, with everything you need to complete a bracelet except a clasp and wire or stringing material. Of course, I've included some of my beads but I also included some fabulous copper beads with intricate Bali-type sterling decorative elements.
I will remain, as is
I almost feel sorry for you. You need to be in a relationship. You can’t be alone. You claim that you can be, but you haven’t for years. And now you’ve moved on past me with someone new. I get it. It’s fine. I’m perfectly fine. Unlike you, I have a large network of people surrounding me whom I can count on to talk to and who will meet me when I need a drink or just be there. You need a love interest because you don’t have anyone close to rely on. When we were together, I was your best friend, your confidant, your lover, your drinking buddy, your social life, your home life. You have to date someone in order to have someone to talk to and relate to and go out with. I don’t envy that kind of existence.
Tanya Engelbrecht, 16, and Lavonne Benade, 16, pupils at Pretoria Tuine Technical High School, accused the government in their speeches of not being able to bring crime under control.
Rose’s acceptance of her mother’s affair also bothered me – as did Lane’s apparent lack of distress that her daughter had found out about it. In fact, the whole family was so dysfunctional that it made the story difficult to read because their lives were so fractured and there was so little in the way of meaningful interaction between them. Rose also abandoned her longing for George with a suddenness that seemed at odds with her adoration of him throughout the rest of the book. The kiss between them was a clear, lucid moment in their relationship, and it felt like it should lead to some resolution for her, but the next we hear of him he’s getting married to someone else, and she trots along to the wedding like a dutiful chum, dancing with him and then releasing him to his bride.
If you are reading this post, you are reading my 18th Slice of Life story. "Yay!" When I began this challenge, I didn't know what I was really in for. My biggest concern was finding an extra bit of time, in my already too busy life, to write. Well, so far so good. I have found the time to write, to read slices written by others, and to comment on at least three other posts written by others who have joined this challenge. I don't know about you, but for me the story doesn't always come easy. I call these "dry days". These are the days when I can't seem to think of anything interesting enough to write about. Every story that comes to mind, seems like a story I've already told. Sometimes, I attempt one or two story ideas, but abandon them for lack of inspiration or desire to write them.
Captain Jean-Luc Picard entered the transporter room, tossing a brief backward glance toward his first officer with a look of curious confusion. "Number One? Have you forgotten the way?
We didn’t dare to drive through that mud pit. And fortunately friend didn’t either.
Now, my friends and I joke around a lot. It is one thing to joke around with a group of friends when you’re all together; it is another thing to poke fun at my situation over the internet for other people to see.
This handmade teapot given to me as a birthday gift many years ago by my husband is much loved. (Well yes, both he and the teapot, are much loved!) This teapot is a big one and tends to be in use only when there are crowds around and it gets handled and admired by family and friends. The children amongst us are intrigued and delighted by the tiny teapot handle for the lid. The pot's weight is perfectly balanced in two hands between two essential handles. Little chips have broken off over the years, it has numerous little tea stains on it, but nothing ever daunts the character of this teapot, it is one proud mama!!
I sort of feel bad when people get all excited that Jacob has "taken" to them, because I want to tell them that it doesn't matter who they are, he hugs EVERYBODY. So here we are, contrary to what many people think, worried that our son is not attaching and longing for the day when he plays strange. When we first run into someone Jacob avoids eye contact and turns his face away. This is an important first step. So, if we run into any of you soon and he does this, don't be offended... it's a good thing. He just warms up to people far too quickly.
3. Place onto a cookie sheet and bake for 10-15 minutes or until slightly brown or the cheese starts to bubble.
Jones CL. Herpes simplex virus infection in the neonate: clinical presentation and management. Neonatal Network 1996; 15: 11-15.
Open Vault Disney is in full campaign mode. We have just wrapped up our latest (and hopefully largest) letter writing event to date and are already looking into our next event. On the heels of the newest and largest ever release of titles to the now 13 title strong Generations Collection, we have new found hope for our cause. To that end we will be working harder then ever to persuade Disney to finally finish releasing the Disney Afternoon shows they started on DVD, release other cartoons shows not yet on DVD at all, and get more “Walt-era” titles out of the vault.
And it's a good thing I added that last sentence because my stamps this week are:
“This is the way of formation of criminal gangs, misanthropic political parties, religious sects, known as destructive, that destroy souls, causing damage to the health of their practitioners.
Captain America is the big one really. Eventually becoming leader of The Avengers in the comic books, he is a well loved hero across the world. The film brought us the morale compass that is Steve Rogers and introduced one of the best love stories in comic book movie history which eventually ended in heartbreak as Steve said goodbye to Peggy Carter just as he managed to save America from Red Skull. The final film before The Avengers, everything was tied up as Steve woke up in the modern day and was found by Nick Fury himself.
Dc dec - double crochet decrease
Contestants and entries must comply with ALL of the following criteria. Works that do not conform to the rules will be disqualified.
“Even if everyone else is ashamed of you when things fall to pieces, I won’t be.” Mark 14:27,29 (The Message Bible)
The Guardian has the story. David Allen Green asked if Tom Watson MP had gone too far some months ago by using the ‘Mafia’ metaphor in relation to News International when he questioned James Murdoch.
Oh, and the river you see in the background is the muddy River Hull which runs through the middle of this fair city.
In the next few weeks, I will be working on making up the pattern if anyone is interested. I love my bag-in fact, I have 2-one for each camera. (My husband thinks I am a "camera-aholic"!)
- uh,c ( luiuu,uunora when he heard that nobody was killed sent men to Hunduungu.
The first “holiday” I remember must have been before the age of five (when my brother was born), and it consisted of my Dad borrowing a small van from work over the weekend (he didn’t have a car) and spending the night camped out in it at the seaside. I was supposed to sleep across the front seats, while my parents were bedded down in the back, but I remember being cold and uncomfortable and whiney, and trading places with Father in the early hours.
He's wearing size 3-6 month clothing, but they're still pretty roomy.
For the love that is purest and sweetest
Just some eye-candy for you today in the form of fabulous fringes from around the wedding world. And I’m talking the attached-to-the-head kind, as opposed to the fabric kind used to edge clothing or material. As you know from this post, I shall be (attempting) to rock a fringe on my wedding day, but whereas I am having a constant battle with mine to remain thick and in place, these ladies have been majorly blessed by the fringe fairies.
(what were you thinking?)
11 Fiorenzo Carpi - Mariale'
34) Ditto with cigarettes. I quit cold turkey when the Spouse Sparrow asked me too, and have never had a problem.
However, I've chosen to pursue the traditional publishing route. It may take longer, but it's the path I've chosen, and I'm not going to quit.
So what's missing from this look? The thing that really jumps out at me is the lack of waist definition. Martha has well-proportioned bust and hips combined with a small waist, which puts her in the enviable position of being able to wear just about any type of belt she wants. She could do something as simple as use a thin, solid color belt in the same shade as the dress to bring more emphasis to her waist. She could use a wider belt for a more exaggerated look; it could stay on the subtle side and match the dress, or for higher contrast she could go with a dark brown belt for this particular outfit. The thing about dresses such as this one is that the long expanse of continuous pattern doesn't cause your eye to rest anywhere; it just continues straight on down to the boots. The advantage of this situation is that you have the opportunity to easily draw the eye wherever you want to with minimal accessorizing. Depending on where you position the belt and how wide it is, you can create any sort of shape you want.
Most of our Indian recipes can easily fall under Vegan friendly recipes. But the rule for the theme is to select a non vegan dish and make it a vegan. You cannot post a regular Ven Pongal, minus the ghee and call it a vegan. Or simply call our regular Pooris as Vegan friendly because as such is naturally vegan friendly.
Permanent tree form returning? A shape-shifting color randomizer?
I am officially PRIVATE.
Now, I will be a mother again myself. In all of the fuss and stress and planning of the move, the pregnancy has sometimes slipped back into the recesses of our days. I don't like this and, apparently, either does my body. I've had some issues with signs of preterm labor that have been worrying to say the least. I've had to stay off my feet as much as possible in these last weeks as time ticks away and the to-do list never seems to shorten. But baby kicks me constantly, letting me know s/he is in there, reminding me that despite it all, s/he's growing, s/he's alive and well, that s/he's exploring, that s/he is pretty jazzed when the ice cream comes, that s/he's firmly here and along for the ride.
Cause things are gonna change so fast
But we also heard that there were “orders” from above “arahan dari atas” for the alleged brutality and crackdown.
Hope to see you out there at the Hulmeville on November 20, starting at noon!
I did digitally colour in the image in a paper piecing technique. I then took each section one step further by adding a special effects to bevel the area so that it looks puffy. It is printed out on photo paper, unfortunately my camera didn't like the glossy shine and it was difficult to get a clear shot of it.
Overarching it all is the lure of the open road. On Highway 89 south of Prescott, coming over Ponderosa Pass, we flew through the tight turns on the winding road, windows down, enjoying the way the RX8 cornered, downshifting through six gears and letting the rotary engine rev to levels not possible with pistons. It was a balmy 78 degrees. We drank root beer and Matt spat sunflower seeds out the window, the quintessential American scene, music up, enjoying the road, the car, and the sun. We are feeling very content again.
y crueles me dieron soledad.
In case you missed it — and believe me, the Department of Injustice is hoping you missed it on this 9/11 memorial weekend — yet another violent crime (perpetrated by a suspected illegal alien )has been linked to Obama Fast and Furious guns.
It’s the crazy expensive path to take.
Everyone knows that massage gets the blood and lymph flowing in your body. But did you know it's great for your face as well? I was instantly intrigued by the Gankin facial massage technique I came across about six months ago. Now this is truly amazing. If you can spare three minutes just a few nights a week, you'll see a gradual tightening of the jawline. (Allegedly, the jowls we often develop in our 40s and beyond are just pockets of stagnant lymphatic fluid that've chronically distended the jawline. After what I've seen of the effects of Gankin massage, I believe it.) Once you lapse your practice, of course the jawline softens again. Fortunately, it's so easy to reverse.
Stephanie Yera is a communications associate at The New York Times Company. Yera is a 2009 graduate of the School of Journalism and Mass Communication at UNC-Chapel Hill. She previously worked as an intern and corporate communications assistant at Dow Jones and Company. In this interview, conducted by e-mail, Yera talks about her job duties and journalism education.
But when I came into the room and saw this tonight, I had to snap a picture:
“Well, I appreciate you looking out for me, but really, I’m sure it’s fine. Just because the man doesn’t tell the world what he had for breakfast every day doesn’t mean he’s a psychopath.”
Tutor for Pages for iPad
Have you been coming up with new ideas for your business for 2012? Our first tip of the year is to write down your ideas when you think of them. Candy makers live fast-paced lives, moving from chocolate tempering to supply ordering to payroll, oftentimes all within the first hour of the day. If you don't write down what you're thinking, there is a pretty good chance you'll forget it.
And usually twice each month,”
1:00 p.m. FREE showing for GPSD and WLSD – SOLD OUT
Ad Network Detector scans your phone or tablet for the presence of the most common ad networks used in mobile apps, giving you insight into what types of ads can be displayed, and what information is gathered by the ad networks. With easy access to this information, you’ll be able to decide whether you want to keep the app that has certain ad networks on your phone.
You can use any craft materials you like to make your DT work (except copyright protected images of course),
We had a wonderful last week celebrating my daughter's seventh birthday
4th step
that she rented by the hour,
On top of that, once I returned to Dijon, I soon found a shop that sold coffee and tea items. There, in the display window, I saw one of your siblings. And he was cheaper than you.
Sleep: Bed by 6:45-7ish, up by 6:30ish (yes, it's getting a little later that she wakes up! yay! just in time for us to be up all night with Baby M #2! haha)
Stephen Goldspink, Peterborough City Councillor.
By Mother Nature he was produced in that special, that most wonderfully unmarvelous and disgusting as well way that he, to tell the truth, stood absolutely no chance to catch sight of the first and the main and the most sentimental for nothing wonder of his hole life-term. Quite sinful a wonder of wonders that would wander its way from the very fleshy desires. Ah, this wonderful world! Viva el mundo, viva la vida! Perversity fathers innocence, filthiness – purity. Passion was the reason for it and him. The sin was the nurse, the clerk and the rhyme.
and for good measure
FYI...
And love Creation's final law
And simply sit
Organic Named Digital Agency of Record for PepsiCo’s Quaker Brands
Perhaps the most striking thing of his recent performance is who he’s pitched against. He shut down two of baseballs most prominent offenses, Detroit and the Yankees. He’s also beaten a rejuvinated Minnesota lineup with Mauer and Morneau healthy thus far. Tonight he beat a Toronto team that is always among the league leaders in on base percentage. Texas paid a hefty transfer fee to his former Japanese club, but early returns indicate he’s worth it.
How kind you kept me—
When he sleeps
Step 2. Add a small scoop of your powder (when you have made a few you will discover the joy of trying different combinations of coloured powders for different effects however for the most part I stick to a neutral or golden shimmer so as to make my home made mists more versatile.) Swirl your bottle to mix in your shimmer
The Cricut is for more than just scrapbooking and card making, this wondrous little machine has allowed me to spruce up my girls school.
As we know, Brian Coleman is a busy man. He is a very important man. Or rather he thinks he is a very important man. Places to go, canapes to scoff, people to upset. He must be allowed to travel at top speed through the streets of London without impediment. He must not be slowed down, or kept waiting. Such obstacles are an affront to his sense of self esteem.
Tonight we your children are here young and old we are all children in your hands, please bless us in Jesus name, carry us in your arms and bless us in Jesus name.
The next night we explored the streets and found a great Irish Pub Fado's. Place was very comfortable, the man knew how to pour the Guiness, and they had 6 Nation's Rugby on the TV, does life get much better than this? It's on 4th street across the street from the gay bars. This place was way too cozy, and the Carlsberg I was drinking was much better than I've had it anywhere else. We jazzed it up for dinner at III Forks for some excellent steaks. No beer this time, just Pinot Noir. The place was packed and the kicker is that we barely were able to get reservations.
Suzanne Rheinstein's, Hollyhock, carries la creme de la creme in accessories, antiques, as well as her eponymous upholstery and fabric lines. We shop all the time, but these accessories and vignettes are breathtaking.
If thou wert sensible of courtesy,
Laura A. Giglio, 35, Oceanside, N.Y.
Anyhow, here is my short story. It’s called “His Smirk.”
I made this card on Sunday afternoon after a session of DT work when I wanted to make something just for fun.
The 295 words and phrases blocked by Chinese Web censors
Yes, except when they don't. The home invader might be crazy, have nothing to lose, or are deaf from the adrenalin or just deaf.
I don't like rules debates, so I will simply say that contrary to popular belief, there is no mandated level of role-playing in the Storyteller System. Guyliner and Joy Division are optional. In the Gamist - Narrativist - Simulationist model of game design, the Storyteller system is surprisingly Gamist and very simple mechanically. This could account for why I love the World of Darkness, but struggle with FATE-based games. Like D&D, a WoD player has to infuse role-playing into the scenes and does not benefit from special mechanics aimed at "narrative control", "compelling aspects" or anything else. It's just Attribute + Skill.
We started with a shrimp cocktail and ahi-tuna that was out of this world. I’m not sure what type of sauce they drizzled on the plate, but it was a bit sweet and spicy – totally made the dish.
Here Hibbert (1962, p. 47) is describing a lifelong attitude of Mussolini that continued right into his time as Italy's Prime Minister -- when he refused to take his official salary. Given the contempt for the rich so often expressed by Leftists almost everywhere, Mussolini was clearly a Leftist paragon in that regard.
At first, JJS is enchanted and impressed by the passion and devotion of the “Christians” he encounters at the Bible study: they are serious, smart, and sincere. But he eventually reads some other books and has a theodicy issue: he writes, “The hell stuff: I never made peace with it” (29). He concludes:
Textured Ceilings – What Makes This a Popular Home Design?
David Harley
Ms. Goodman is the Editor of History Musings. She has a BA in History & Art History & a Masters in Library and Information Studies from McGill University, and has done graduate work in history at Concordia University.
I did watch some of the reality series she did with then-husband Bobby Brown, but that was mainly to witness what still sounded like an unlikely pairing, and the train-wreck-in-the-making that her life had seemingly become.
I am still trying to figure out the drawers. I think the extra scissors, tapes etc will go in there. It will sit right next to my chair for easy access. YEAH!
In a nutshell, this is a proper old-fashioned adventure yarn. It is narrated by the now-iconic Allan Quatermain, an English hunter making his living shooting game in South Africa. He is on a boat returning to his home in Durban when he meets Sir Henry Curtis and his friend, naval officer Captain John Good. Sir Henry is attempting to find his brother, last seen heading out on a suicidal mission across the desert in search of King Solomon's legendary diamond mines. He enlists Quatermain's (rather reluctant) help and the three set out for the mountains, aided by a crudely-drawn map left to Quatermain by the last fool to attempt the journey.
Pix: If all in Malaysia adopted ‘national’ names like the Indonesians, what would be hers? Haniza?
I'm gonna get through this
It made me value my friendships.
Comments: I like the characterization for everybody in this story, although I doubt that Marjorie would really have been as phlegmatic as it appears here.
Thus says The Lord: Did you think My wrath would tarry forever?! Did you think My judgment sleeps?! Are My eyes closed to all these atrocities committed upon the earth, day and night, without ceasing?! Are My ears also stopped from hearing?!… Lo, I have seen and I have heard!
Spring has come in on the same rails as winter rode out. Temperatures often exceed 60 degrees and things are predictably early. The first peepers were about 10 days ahead of schedule, the red wing blackbirds, which I’ve always considered the real harbingers of the end of winter, arrived 2 weeks early. The black currants have already flowered and little green berries are forming at the base of every spent blossom. The reds, whites and pinks are not far behind. Winter was uncomfortably warm and virtually snowless and March, the month I usually refer to as “mud month” here on the farm was without precipitation. I’ve never seen such a dry winter and spring so far. April was not looking much more promising until this past weekend when we were kissed with almost 2 inches of rain. A big wet kiss, I’m unashamed to report. I could almost hear the farm breathe a sigh of relief.
No. Not really. I dread picking up the phone because I know I'm in trouble for something. I hate the weekends and holidays because it means very long days with him at home, never knowing if he will be in a good mood or if we will all be walking on eggshells. Never knowing if the thing that made him laugh yesterday will have him screaming at me today. Never knowing if my latest penance was enough, if I'm forgiven yet. If he loves me again. What's going to bother him today? What did I do wrong? What want should I have anticipated? Will his anger be directed only at me or will he take it out on the kids?
Daniel Coyle, The Talent Code
This time last year i looked like
Awesome is always the first word that comes to mind. Baltimore as a whole is a very odd city, especially these days. I grew up south of the city, but have been around for the last fifteen years or so, and the ways in which the city is changing are...marked, I guess would be the best word. Baltimore is a blue-collar town, just people who do their own thing and don't ask for help, and there's been a huge influx of development in the last five-to-seven years, which has created a really interesting, and sometimes unfortunate dynamic. The art scene has followed suit, with galleries where there were hourly motels, performance spaces in abandoned warehouses, organic pizza joints in old shoots galleries. On any given night, you're almost guaranteed to find some type of reading, whether it's poetry, fiction, performance, or show-and-tell. The writers themselves reflect this weird amalgamation, somewhere between raw talent and 'I don't give a fuck, I'll just do it myself.' I think Baltimore was mainly known for the crime fiction, because you see it every day, but a lot of the writers round here have begun to get some real attention. Michael Kimball's latest book Us just made Oprah's reading list. Jen Michalski has a book coming out on Dzanc soon. Adam Robinson's Publishing Genius Press had one of their releases optioned by Spike Jones last year. It's like the rest of the world has finally tuned in to all the talented people around here. I'm sure a lot of cities could say the same thing and this is mainly hometown pride, but fuck it. I'm proud to be a Baltimore writer.
Because her killing does not appear to be connected to the scandal, French investigators are not looking into the causes of her death or the reasons behind it.
Benny
I mean seriously, how is this movie THIS BORING? I can’t even describe how boring it is except to say that I couldn’t remember what happened in it right after I finished watching it. Hellraiser III is a miracle of bland characters, nonexistent story and phoned in directing so perfectly unmemorable that it will be like you never watched the movie at all, and isn't that the ONLY way to watch a movie? After all, that way it will seem BRAND NEW again when you watch it a second time, and brand new after that when you watch it a third time!
In other news I have completed my red square and am both excited about it, and in a silly way, a tad embarrassed. My piece is very novice, but I enjoyed doing it, and am pleased with how it looks.
The last year has had many highs with the top being that I have got a visa to live in Australia and quite a few lows including redundancy, tough first contact and struggling to get my foot back in the door working.
I can roleplay a sonnet with syllables
I love to read well-researched novels. It seems many of my favorite authors are in it for the joy of research, and spend hours meandering down history lanes, or psychology avenues, or literally down the garden path. The dose of reality they infuse into their plots makes reading that much more interesting, and many times I’ve felt prompted to pursue a topic or an idea simply because of the seeds planted during a well-informed read.
But this dog, who didn't care for children and had never been taught to play, was not Lassie or Rin Tin Tin, and my heart was broken. I consoled myself by reading books about imaginary dogs, and spending hours poring over dog encyclopedias trying to decide on the perfect pup.
SO
I have to say here how grateful I was (and am) for our friends. The hospital was an hour away from home, so impractical for Tom to come back once he'd dropped us off. But, our good friends, Sanjay and Jackie stay there in that town. Three times a day they brought meals. I was so grateful! There was really nowhere else to get food. Jackie was a star--not only bringing a sandwich, but bringing full cooked meals. She even remember napkins and everything! It made such a difference to have that break in my day when meals and some conversation walked through my door.
On his face.
People's view of the past had the greatest effect on life satisfaction.
The fine feathered touch of the clouds brush lightly against the the cool skin of structures reaching towards the distant comfort of loftier aspirations and shadows cast on the world below muffle the quickened heartbeats and soft sighs of this not-so-clandestine meeting.
Tradition
This doubled with the fact that I have no current work experience, any references or an actual resume (i would write one up if someone asked me to drop by with one) makes me feel super frusterated and pretty let down. I even tried the tactic of casually chatting with people for awhile about a relevant topic and then slipping in the “oh you wouldnt happen to be looking for anyone would you?”.
But I have to admit I’m a little apprehensive about attempting research-heavy projects. I keep telling myself that I only failed with Mortality because I was so pressed for time. Quantity above quality is part of the whole idea of NaNo, after all. But as reassuring as that voice in my head is, I don’t fully believe it. There is somehow a strange disconnect between compiling knowledge and putting it to use. At least for me.
“I can’t see this drop in premiums being sustainable for long. My fear is that if prices do continue to drop, we’ll see a repeat of 2009, when industry losses led to premiums suddenly rocketing up following a long period of little movement.”
Usually when people talk about deus ex machina, they're criticizing a writer for painting him or herself into a corner, plot-wise, and using any method possible to get out of it. Certainly, it's probably not the most satisfying ending in the world to have a cop suddenly show up and shoot all the bad guys, despite no one having called the cops.
Vernal Equinox marks the start of the spring season. It is the time when day and night are the same length. This equality signifies our passage from darkness and cold to warmth and light. It is a time of balance, new beginnings, action and fertility.
You should have read the first of the prescribed sections (sections 10 and part of 11) from Essay 1. Although the other sections of the essay are not prescribed and therefore not directly relevant to our course (and not directly relevant to the assessment you will face) you may get some value from reading them.
And I was included in this really special thing that they created. Because someone felt I deserved it. And then it was a TOTAL SURPRISE because I am a bad blog reader, so I had no idea what was going on!
The daily wine, and the proscecco and the cocktails
And I ordered my last order on Sunday when Patti had restocked with the latest shipment...
*Simple Black Chinese Abacus (No power = no calculator)
*Have you ever been knocked unconscious? I don't fight. I hug.
He said to them, “Haven’t you read what David did when he and those who were with him were hungry— how he entered the house of God, and they ate the sacred bread, which is not lawful for him or for those with him to eat, but only for the priests? Or haven’t you read in the Law that on Sabbath days the priests in the temple violate the Sabbath and are innocent? But I tell you that something greater than the temple is here! If you had known what this means: I desire mercy and not sacrifice, you would not have condemned the innocent. For the Son of Man is Lord of the Sabbath. (1)
Tonight was my first date back in NY, my first date with a New Jersian, and my first date met through this very blog! Melanie, a super cute, fun, and bubbly girl, took me up on my offer to get a copy of my key if she set me up with a male friend and then doubled with us on the date. Though she currently lives in NJ she confessed a love exploring NY and described Scott in the following manner:
Hi ladies who got February Swap kits.....
Unlikely that this will spread, and unlikely that I will need the Ronnie Lott treatment. Nonetheless, unsettling.
Happy Friday mes amis!
It has only been a few weeks, but I really think it's time to go back. The first photo is of Cinnamon Bay, and we stayed in a "rustic" cabin just a few steps from the beach. The second photo was taken from a taxi ride on the main road, and is of Caneel Bay resort, the not-so-rustic place where celebrities vacation. Every cab driver we met told us that they see Alan Alda all the time out here. We didn't see him.
still have some nice usable leftovers!!
Moving on, as the disappointment fades away and I've taken the time to readjust and refine my goals for later in the year. I see that whatever happens, the only limits I really face are the ones I choose to accept. Even though there are some practical boundaries defined by my personal makeup, every situation which occurs brings with it a moment to stop, reflect, reassess and move forward in a redefined way. Moments of disappointment and frustration can be used to advantage to look in different directions than I'd initally hoped or planned to do. The choice is mine, do I wish to recreate my life at the moments things don't go the way I'd planned them to, or do I stay stuck in the moment, frantically trying and hoping to extricate myself from the situation I find myself in but not getting any further, and blaming the world around me for not indulging me in my wishes?
What I thought: This book definitely falls on the darker side of the spectrum, but it’s dark in subtle ways and stops short of going into full-on depression mode; characters are left with some kind of imperfect hope. A lot of the stories illustrate the ways that the traditions and values of the past have settled into an uneasy relationship with contemporary times. My favorite stories were “Prison,” about a middle-aged Chinese American couple whose teenage daughter dies, which spurs them to travel to China to find a surrogate mother so they can have another child; and “Sweeping Past,” about an elderly Chinese woman thinking back on friendship lost. Overall I thought the collection was a little uneven, but I do think Li’s writing is elegant throughout.
That’s why alternative cancer treatments strictly forbid sugar consumption. Of course, mainstream oncology does not even discourage sugar. It’s widely understood that we all contain some free floating cancer cells that have not developed into tumors.
In the middle of Mr Bird’s cross examination the press gave further publicity to phone kicking allegations, which provided Mr Sheridan with additional ammunition for his questioning.
America is great! Go fold your tents.
I brought it home and gave it a good bath, it had definitely been sitting a while. After it dried, I sprayed it with a light coat of Valspar Plastic Primer. It really gives a nice surface to glass as well as plastic, so the paint can grab on and stay! Since I’m not a big fan of traditional “pumpkin orange” I used Valspar Satin La Fonda Copper. It’s a little deeper orange. One coat did the job!
Rnd 3) ch2, 2dc in first st, dc in next st, * 2dc in next st, dc in next st, repeat from * around, sl st to top of first st
I have not written fiction for a very long time. Perhaps the story I was meant to write had not yet been lived, so I had nothing to say. But now I do have something to say. I am steeped in grief still, but when I can step away from myself for a moment and am not involved in the pain, it strikes me as such an all-encompassing experience that I would like to explore it in a novel. It is a story that needs to be written — it is so little understood, this coming of age in middle age.
DHL is strong on trappists as well, aged or not. Indeed, if you order an Orval, you will get a bottle that has been aged for 6 months unless you specifically ask for a fresh bottle. The Ambassadeur Orval title was granted to 340 cafés, taverns and restaurants which promote Orval with good presentation, service and originality. An obvious PR stunt from the brewery's side, but needless to say, DHL qualifies.
And that £20 note which you sent me for Christmas - that which you didn't really have to send, and that which I have no need of - I've put it between dog-chewed books of dead poets, the greatest tragedy I have. Oh it's cruel to keep it, I know, but I can't send it back as that'd be too sad, and it's worth far too much to spend. And we both know what twenty pounds signifies, how at times we didn't have that between three of us, and we laid on our backs in our house of sickness, dying. Do you remember? How you cried, said your body couldn't take it, and could I do nothing to help? But I was in pain too and could hardly walk, and my illness was a day older than yours. Do you remember? I do. It seems like a good memory now.
I don’t understand, honestly. It’s like the “job interview” tips. The “tricky” questions are everywhere on the Internet. The “clever” and “good” answers to them are also all over. And, strange enough, they do ask you these questions when you go to a job interview. And you do answer the way you read you should. What’s the point? Except, of course, if they are looking for someone who like to pretend it’s someone else.
Verse 1
Next time, I could have made these a bit thicker, but they were tasty. I also brushed on some cream and sanding sugar. Sanding sugar is happiness in little crystals. Put it on everything. Except maybe steak.
4) Sic Alps- Ranger- 3:26
These live websites are only part of the story. Like spammers who switch servers to avoid detection, CK periodically changes names and URLs. Its past ventures include BookAnnouncements.com, BookStorePromotion.com, Book-blitz.net, LibraryPromotion.com, OnlineBookTours.net, and SellMoreBooks.net (though the sites are dead, discussion of them survives, here and here).
Genre: AU! Angst, Romance
"...while it is tempting to believe that the size of a candidate's online fan-base is significantly helpful in getting elected, the numbers just don't add up." Some examples:
- Lewis Carroll
== It's not all bad news ==
files that was closest to what I was wanting, and then printed another copy for dissection. The first copy I used to make a blank pocket, and the second I used to cut out the hearts for placement onto the blank pocket. Just what I wanted!! And how can you beat 4 pockets for $1.50?? YA CAN"T!! So hurry over to The Cutting Cafe and check out this file along with all the other fabulous printable sets and files that Regina has. Remember that all files come in PDF format and most also come in WPC and SVG formats.
Gustave Flaubert:
So the return to the 1980's 'tit for tat' with C18 V AFA is over - so they now need an excuse to ban the EDL.
It then so happened that on the day before our shoot she was also shooting with an artist whose work inspires me Rebecca Parker and Rebecca kindly invited me along to the shoot she was having with Ella Rose.
The city of Norfolk, Va., is getting an early look at what sea-level rise means for a big coastal community. The city is experiencing sea-level rise earlier than most because not only are the seas around the city going up, but much of the land beneath Norfolk is going down. This one-two punch means the city is seeing today the kind of flooding that many cities could experience down the road if the scientific projections of sea-level rise play out.
So, yeah, not sure why I feel like I need to let you guys in on the mundane and boring conversations that go on between the Bubba and I, but basically, he can see the future, I'm crazy and my Crazy leaked out all over the tomato transplant situation to the point where I custom designed plant tags for everything, laminated them, built a support site to gather pictures and tomato seeds and other people's Crazy and holy hell if it's not all the way out of control and so super fun that I'm feeling like an extra big nerd.
Bruce Wilson – One of the biggest challenges facing a designer is to breathe soul into a project. These chairs are well used and the leather is worn in all the right places. They look like a couple of old friends and have history that new store-bought purchases cannot be expected to have. They add that element of ‘quirky’ that personalizes a room.
- 1/2 tablespoon of caster sugar
In May of 1948, the year that witnessed the foundation of the OAS, an institution with a shameful history which did away with what little was left from the dreams of the Liberators of the Americas, Canada was from belonging to it. It kept that same status for more than 40 years, until 1990. Some of its leaders visited us. One of them was Pierre Elliott Trudeau, a brilliant and courageous politician who died prematurely. We attended his burial on behalf of Cuba.
This bill adds the services provided by Certified Professional Midwives as a new category of mandated health service under the federal-state Medicaid program.
Jesus Christ Is the True Vine Who Bears Much Fruit in Us
I must mention here, as well, that Alec’s “chat-up” with Darren, on their first encounter, is one of the most original seduction scenes I have ever read. Alec is so painfully shy and inexperienced, and so unconsciously turned-on by this Coppertone Adonis, that he is pathetically charming about it—so much so that you want to hug him and say, “Just do your thing, baby”—which is what the author intended, I’m sure.
However, it does have 2 distinct advantages over other, larger music festivals. The first is it’s less than 15 miles away, and the second is it has a giant willow sculpture that goes up in flames at midnight on the Saturday.
Vari-speed recording- Les Paul
(1) It wets the mixture and causes the ingredients to adhere.
It’s a bit late, but for those who were waiting for it, here I am catching you up with what happened in episode 4 the day before episode 5 airs…hey, gimme a break. It’s been a busy week. First of all, I should mention that things are happening in a different order than they did in the book (A Clash of Kings) but that’s not really an issue because Martin himself has said that the book doesn’t follow a strictly linear timeline, rather that things are happening in different parts of the Seven Kingdoms simultaneously. I’ll get to the plot in a bit, but first I want to talk specifically about the character of Tyrion Lannister and of the actor who plays him (Peter Dinklage for those who didn’t know).
I made the frame of the Native American Indian print is in.
The shop carries a whole bunch of great fabric – lots of the super popular
Chasing my tail.
3. Gold Digger
Furthermore, suicide should be legal, as should gambling. And it’s questionable as to whether it really counts as committing suicide anyway — if you have a 1 in 6 chance of dying, is pulling the trigger really attempted suicide? Or is it simply a risk, like parachuting or driving recklessly? Sticky issues…
Established in 1933 with a fleet of only five airplanes, Star Alliance member, Turkish Airlines is today a four star airline with a fleet of 179 aircraft (passenger and cargo) flying to 191 cities around the world, comprised of 40 domestic and 151 international destinations. One of the fastest growing airline companies, Turkish Airlines has received several “Passengers Choice Awards” from the consumer ranking group, Skytrax. Based on 2011 results, Turkish Airlines has been chosen as the winner in 3 categories, “Best Airline Europe”, “Best Premium Economy Seats” for its Comfort Class seats and “Best Airline Southern Europe”. It has also received awards for its catering and holds a coveted 4-star designation, putting the airline in a small group of top quality carriers. Turkish Airlines was also given the Skytrax designation of “World’s Best Economy Class On-board Catering” in 2010, and Skyscanner’s “Best On-board Food 2011″. Long haul Business Class passengers also enjoy the Flying Chef service on-board. For more information visit www.thy.com.
Yeah. We need a few more months of football.
I will admit to getting up at 5am Central time to watch the Royal Wedding of Prince William and Kate Middleton. I missed all of the nonsense of the arrival of the guests, what they were wearing (although, I did see pictures of that 'hat' that Princess Beatrice wore. seriously?) I turned on the tv just in time to see Catherine and her father exit the car to enter Westminster Abbey. I gasped with joy when I first saw her gown. She looked beautiful, as a princess should.
The winners of the 2012 Freddie Awards have been announced, with American Airline’s AAdvantage program doing the best out of all the airlines and Marriott and Starwood both doing well in the hotel categories.
Saturday May 5 was Kentucky Derby Day but we were both so full from dinner the night before with Barb and Paul and constant food from breakfast to midday, we watched without snacking. However before the race, I journeyed into Berne to see the local attraction--the Swiss clock tower park. This area is replete with Amish but many of the others are descendants of Swiss settlers. For several years the tiny town of Berne hosts Swiss Days right around the July 4th holidays; and for a few years there has been work to build a clock tower park in the midst of the town. There are local jokes about the cost of this, but it is a beautiful center and certainly a place depicting their heritage. The massive clock tower still needs work and friends said the hands of the clock fell off shortly after they were attached calling for more craftsmanship.
11:15 a.m.–12:30 p.m. Breakout Sessions
Every Wednesday this blog talks marriage! I introduce a topic, and then you either comment on it or, better still, go to your own blog and write a Wifey Wednesday post, and then come back here and link to it!
Djelimady Tounkara: guitar
So this is part 1 of my first homemade Limoncello making experience. Part 2 will be adding the sugar syrup (and tasting it) and returning it to the cellar. If it tastes good at this point, I will put some in the freezer because I am impatient and will return the rest to the maturation process. Part 3 will be the final result. I would love it anyone would go along with this process and comment. It would be interesting to compare results.
The online payday loan is a very short term loan. It can alternatively be called a paycheck advance. This online loan helps the borrower pay for his expenditure until he/she receives his/her next salary….. Read More >>
The purpose of holding your Light on high is to motivate yourselves, and all those with whom you interact, to awaken. As I said, you have the all help from the spiritual realms that you need in order to do this, but you too have to respond with the strong intent to awaken, because you have free will and you cannot and will not be coerced into doing so. God’s Will for you is that you use your divine gifts – free will, love, compassion, acceptance, forgiveness, and so on – as you truly desire. But you can only do this by releasing your doubts, fears, and anxieties, or any feelings that suggest to you that you are not truly worthy.
Big congratulations to surprise winner " I'll Have Another" at the derby yesterday. And a huge thank you to my sweet hubby who made sure to wake me up in time to actually watch the race. I was on the couch watching the pre race stuff and kept falling aslee. He woke me three times to be sure I got to watch--NICK ROCKS!
I was such a silly cow, running in circles, trying to find the image of the perfect pasture.
I used Copic to color the image and on the ribbon I add some little touches of Star Dust Stickles. After I cut the image I stick it on the patterned.
Una will be speaking at Access Alliance’s Where Women Work series for newcomer young women on International Women’s Day, March 8th, about her work as a graphic designer.
It's a new year, and with that comes a flood of new ideas and new commitments that many of us make to ourselves. Since I'm usually terrible at keeping new year's resolutions, I've really enjoyed the trend of just picking a word that describes where you would like to focus your attention for the year. Last year I chose 'thrift' as that word (as it applied to my crafting mostly.) I think I did pretty well with using things that I already had on hand instead of always buying a whole bunch of new stuff every time I wanted to try something.
I understand nicotine from the patch made much of this possible. Still, I was amazed at how I was able to push past the physical behavior that seemed so ingrained in my daily routine. What I appreciate most about the patch — unlike the e-cigarette — is that it allows me to wean off nicotine while immediately eliminating all of the nasty habits. My hope is that once I am completely off the patch, I won’t automatically want to light up because I have cut out not only the actual cigarette, but all smoke-mimicking behaviors.
Emphasis on United? No, not really.
All that needed to happen was for our government to have a bit of gumption, some foresight and the tenacity to stick with a plan that would have delivered the possibility to operate world-class naval air assets.
What grades have you taught? pre-K, 1,2,3,7
While we were talking and laughing, we heard voices and footsteps on the path, followed by a dead silence. We realized someone must have heard us and we were naked. There weren’t any convenient fig leaves. Margaret whispered to me to be very still. We waited silently until the voices resumed and then chuckled about how we could cause some poor monk to have a heart attack, so we got dressed in a hurry. Can you imagine how surprised one might have been to find two beautiful wood nymphs out there frolicking in the sacred fields? It still strikes me as odd that we wanted to undress while we were on hallowed ground like that. But that is how it was in Eden.
PACMapper, a tool that would let nursing homes, home health agencies and hospice services better assess geographic market viability, won second prize.
Its orbit carries it *very* far from the Sun - over 3 light-years, in fact. At this distance, the Sun is not the only gravitational force acting on its orbit, but the gravity of other stars may start to be significant, so it's a little unclear if this comet will actually return to our solar system. Even if it does return, it won't be for another 50 million years. Whoa.
When you put 25 teenagers together and deprive them of sleep, feed them junk food and put them under stress breakdowns will inevitably happen. Adding in 150 of their peers relying on them for amusement doesn't help anything. As well as things went (and most of them went wonderfully) bad things do happen. Things that could ruin the truly unique experience of the conference as a whole if you are willing to let them, and I almost did.
» 9/26 – Pittsburgh, PA @ Consol Energy Center
Short guy with a goatee. (Goatees for me lose a point automatically)Turns up in jeans and a shirt with what looked like ketchup on it. I also think he might have been stoned. Jamie and I spent half an hour trying to get some sense out of him and then ten minutes laughing once he had left.
There’s the varmints to deal with – the critics that can’t wait to tell you what you’re doing wrong, and the ones that say you’ll never amount to anything. Evidence of bunny trails crisscrossing my plants were noticed and residue of pests were also detected.
But 4 years & 13 lbs. later she is alive & doing well!!
Bridal... Paper products... jewelry... so much more!
Can you imagine that? 50 people a week writing comments about you while you stand in front of them and try to inform them somehow on a fairly complex topic. It's a little daunting I must say.
There will be daily seminars, visiting lecturers, near-continuous workshops, and don't forget "great food."
Despite all of it's flaws, I still tremendously enjoyed this book, for it's fairly likable characters and engrossing plot. And I kinda had to read the second book right away, since this one ends on a bloody cliffhangers. Cliffhangers, ARG.
The second grater that I got is the same as the first, but with a coarser blade. It has the nice rubber tips and cushy handle (in black...they didn't have green :( . This one advertises on its handy blade cover that it's good for soft cheese, chocolate and such. I gave it a go on chocolate, which worked out as I was having hot chocolate at the time, and it needed that extra kick! The blades were nice and sharp, and put out a fine shaving of chocolate. It would be so easy for melting, or in my case, decorating baked goods! This should prove useful!
out loud. Words take up too much room.
I wanted to have a full shot of my dress with my beautiful city behind me! But I don't think we chose the best location to showcase that...
Then I read that you wrote at your blog, that God has a ‘pure desire for sex in marriage.’ Sir, can I ask you a real, not-in-any-way-sarcastic question? What the hell does that mean? Where in the Bible have you read about God’s ‘pure desire for sex in the marriage’ other than that we should ‘keep the marriage bed pure’ (Hebrews 13:40) and that it should be between a married man and woman (Genesis 2:23-24)? Do you really think that is what the Bible has been preserved for? Do you really think that is what God had on his mind when he told the prophets to speak ‘thus sayeth the Lord’? Do you really think that is what the martyrs were concerned with as they were burned alive? Do you really think that this is what Jesus had in mind when he suffered for our sins? Surely God’s great plan was for our sexual perfection.
Zig 2 way glue
Lies the earth of sandy cream.
From what I've seen, prices range from $2.50 to $2.99 per tube, with an entire box of eight going for about $16.00. The price seemed a bit hefty to me at first, but they're a unique novelty that will surely be a hit at my next get-together or function. With no dirty glasses to worry about, and minimal effort to prepare.. these margarita's would fit the bill perfectly for any barbecue, pool party, or picnic.
Here was my "instructions" - she doesn't wear jewelry, but she's a breast cancer survivor and very proudly sports the pink ribbon whenever she can. Maybe something like a pin would be perfect!
I proclaim freedom to the world.
What was going on with the other 5 kids here at our house? They were doing what all normal, good kids do, driving me nuts!!!!! Seriously, BigD was hanging on me, nagging, and wanting to help. Just for the record, BigD could use nagging as a form of torture. Forget water boarding, send in BigD, they would give up all their secrets.
According to Katherine, or possibly the unicorn, these are the things you should do if you receive the award:
Nevertheless, there are clear indications of a new crisis building up in the eurozone banking sector. For a start, banks are refusing to lend to one another, preferring to park their cash in the ECB, even if this earns them a lower interest rate. A more startling recent development is the fact that Siemens, the giant German engineering firm, has deposited almost half its cash reserves (€6bn) with the ECB, rather than with commercial banks. Eurozone banks have also had difficulty in securing dollar loans from US banks, vital funding to conduct their US and global business. The ECB was forced to step in and offer eurozone banks unlimited dollar funds on the basis of three-month loans (though this will cost the banks more than loans from the commercial money markets, which have begun to dry up).
In contrast to federal banking policy, New York's policy was much more far-sighted and intelligent. The Erie Canal was financially successful beyond its most enthusiastic bankers' wildest expectations. The $7 million borrowed to build the canal was quickly repaid and shrewdly deposited, unlocking banks with a view to furthering economic development across the state. Additionally, in 1839, New York set up the Safety Deposit Fund which all state banks were forced to join. The fund insured depositors against bank failures and fund officials had the right to review the solvency of New York's Banks. This was the forerunner of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and generally of state and federal banking regulations and legislation - the subject of today's controversy. These state regulations played a prominent role in the state's rise as the nation's financial center and in the prosperity this city has enjoyed until now.
Only two of those stories of Jesus have birth narratives, however, and Mark – written first – does not.
The Committee for Pastoral Practice held three meetings in 2011:
Sugarcubes 1986-1992
Apparently I ask for too much.
There goes Tim.
While people looking for jobs, dealing with crime, high food prices, keeping a roof over their heads, looming gas strikes and poor government representation the National Grandmother busy acting like HD’s back up dancer…..all she missing is some Ammen’s Powder and a gold toof!
We used U-shaped pins to anchor the soaker hose in place. At first we used landscape fabric pins, but they were expensive, and if the hose jerked from a bit of air in the line, it tended to pull the pins right out of the soil. I came up with the bright idea of using wireframe coat hangers instead. We snip off the curve that hangs over the clothes rod and bend them into U-shaped pins with longer arms. These work great to hold the soaker hose in place. You push the ends of the pins into the ground, allowing the curve of the U to push the hose into place.
Then I decided that I didn’t like the ads, that they interrupted the flow of the story. So I took them out.
Since my recent journey to the Champagne region of France, I have writing and planning a number of posts, several which you will find on my blog this upcoming week. It was a fascinating region, one that I recommend you visit, and I had the opportunity to taste plenty of delicious Champagnes. This is a region with a rich and vibrant history, and which remains relevant today as well. Though there is much tradition in Champagne, they are not adverse to change, and there are a number of mavericks and innovators in the region. Though you will find plenty of producers holding true to the traditions too.
Knit up in this beautiful glowing brown, I think it suits my little guy very well.
alhamdulillah , yesterday was indeed a great day to describe. great for me & my parents.
Bicyclist Floyd Landis, stripped of his 2006 Tour de France win after testing positive for testosterone, is the subject of a federal investigation into a $450,000 defense fund he create
Indeed, in court defending himself, Sheridan achieved victory in one case and came close to winning the perjury case itself, being found guilty by a minority of the jury. As the trial went on, even the legal professionals became impressed by how competently Sheridan had mastered the facts of the case and, indeed, how he presented his own defence (presumably without the so-called writing skills of McCombes).
And, what did Pippa Middleton ever do to anyone - I mean except her sister, wossname, whom she totally stole the limelight from? I think she’s an adorable little lady and I love her name.
I plan to continue posting, just on a non-structured basis. (I even forced myself to wait to post this note until Tuesday so that I wouldn't be keeping to my schedule through the backdoor. Ha!) Honestly, I'm not sure that less frequency will make any difference to anyone. It might even boost the fun of new posts...who knows? Maybe I just need to fashion a nice tombstone for the whole thing and let it rest in peace. Not yet, though.
But I think that it is time to escape Hope’s clutches – to break her grip on me, finger by taloned finger – and get on with living the best life I can in the circumstances that prevail now. I am not helping myself by living in a permanent holding pattern, waiting for something to change. It’s not likely to – not in the near future, at least.
CAFE DE LA MAIRIE - best people-watching ever
It didn't register. She likes Asahi Super Dry. That's beer. The local stuff, ji-beer, doesn't rate.
Copics, embellished with My Mind's Eye DP, two buttons and floss and the sentiment is from Kraftin
Back to today: twenty years later, Monkey and I are about to celebrate our 14th wedding anniversary and have two lovely children. Yesterday, I was out with Dash, the adorable six-year-old, at his karate practice. There was one other mom also watching her son and between poking on our iPhones, we started chatting. Her son was one of the two Jacks—the light-haired one, not the dark-haired one—an eight-year-old with a yellow belt. We'd smile at each other when one of our kids screwed up and got yelled at by the sensei. I learned Jack was an only child, but was born in the same year/month as Rosie, my gorgeous and talented older child. She lived nearby and had been in the DC area for a while, but was from Connecticut (where my family is originally from).
As I mentioned, I do not believe it is an accident Cindy wrote this book at this special time of the year. Easter and Passover both happening at the same time! Do you know anyone that could use this, someone who may be struggling, searching? Maybe a teenager who is just stuck right now with the struggles teens go through? Are you reaching out? Mother's Day is coming up, Graduations, and Father's Day. Many opportunities to treat ourselves or others to a marvelous beginning!
3. Bring something to the table. This is a Randy Pausch line. What do you or your organization bring to the table? Make sure that you are explicit in what the sponsorship offers the other person. I field sponsorship requests frequently, and a HUGE lacking in many of the proposals is what do I get out of it? Many proposals have plenty of "this is what we need," but rarely is there a strong case for "this what your sponsorship can do for you." And "your name will appear on the website" is not a great incentive for me. I've had my name all over the place, and I can't think of a single time where it got me anything. I'm sorry, but altruism is out the window when you're asking for a commitment.
If you want any further clarification feel free to contact us
Belt: Round studs & rivets leather belt from NEW LOOK
My One Little Word for this year is really a HUGE word for me. I am not a goal setter. I don't ever feel like I reach things I wish to reach. I rarely feel that sense of accomplishment that comes with seeing something through to the end that is meaningful to you.
“Yah. Jus’ come wit’ me and we ken talk ’bout it. See, involves this girl…” he started as the two of the exited her room.
Just before the high school band concert on Monday, she acted even more lethargic and weird, so Meri stayed home with her. The concert was great! It'll be interesting to hear how the Jazz band does next year after losing so many seniors. But they are all so talented, I think they'll still sound swingin'! Here is a sample. Maddy played the accordion on one song. Yep - I said that! It'll be a while for that one to upload, so I'm doing Jalopeno Dreams first. That one is definitely one of our favorites this year. The tune stays with you and drives Maddy nuts when you hum or whistle it around the house... She's the one wailing on the vibes.
Following the large commercial and critical success of Neil Young’s 1972 release Harvest, which charted at number one across the country, not only in Canada, but the US, the UK and other places, Neil Young’s music went into a transitional period. While the success of Harvest and the song “Heart of Gold” in particular did very well and brought Young success, there were a few other factors that would add to his personal situation, changing his outlook on music and the world.
Our wonderful Yvonne has stepped down from her DT position. She has a new and exciting business and we wish her the very best.
For the past seven months, I have been a researcher studying the experience of immigrants in Germany. Scratch that. I have been a two-time immigrant studying the experience of other immigrants in a city with one of the highest migrant populations in Germany.
13. Go rollerskating or ice skating: I went ice skating with Mike, Elle and Bryan a few months back and it was so much fun!
In a
I feel terrible for the guy but I feel much worse for myself. I know its tough for Greg, but then again he has been paid more then $20 million over the last five years - more than enough to live in luxury for the rest of his life and pursue whatever other endeavors he wishes. But what about me? I was glad the Blazers picked him over Durant, I thought it was the correct decision. Now how many NBA championships will I have to watch Durant win before I can forget the whole episode.
The shura considered various options for permanent housing for bin Laden before deciding that he should live a secluded family life in a city that would not be too far from Pakistan's tribal areas, according to the Mehsud tribal sources. The third-ranking member of the hierarchy, Mustafa al-Uzayti, a Libyan better known by his alias Abu Faraj al Libi, was tasked with finding the best location for bin Laden and his family to reside, according to Qadir's Mehsud tribal sources.
The setting is New York, where our characters range from denizens of the slums to the upper crust, and everything in between. Barbara is a well-to-do sculptress in search of inspiration. She finds it in the face of a legless beggar named Blizzard, whom she plans to craft into the figure of Lucifer, moments after his fall from grace.
It did occur to us later that they might have meant that we were traditional because we cooked every evening like they did. It’s all we can come up with.
While India have emerged victorious in eight of their 15 limited over games at Eden, they lost three of their last four ties. One was rained out.
Xilla: Im going to tell her that too.
I found out I got the job I was hoping for. Woo hoo go me!
Taking the results ward by ward in alphabetical order, we first come to Clubmoor, where Andrew Edward Philip Harvey secured a startling 26 votes, some 0.78% of the total. In County ward, Peter James Stafford won a truly memorable 17 votes, or 0.6% of the total. Everton however, was to provide a slightly more encouraging result with a whopping 50 votes (1.7%) won by its female candidate Jacqueline Stafford. This was enough, as was also the case in Clubmoor and County, to gain her an unchallenged last place. Did Fazakerley buck the trend? Well, to a certain extent yes! Peter Stafford managed not to come last by taking 50 votes and a 1.51% share. However, it was Norris Green that was to play host to the BFP's strongest showing in Liverpool, where its candidate Peter Squire achieved 2.77% with 78 votes and came third. As for the party's performance in Basildon, this was to be the BFP's most 'impressive', which was still very weak indeed: Tony Harris polled 87 Votes, securing a 4.2% share and fourth position out of five.
3. Using a pastry blenderor 2 knives, cut the shortening into the flour mixture until coarse crumbs form. (or you can do this in the food processor too)
We are thrilled to be working with Holy Trinity’s students, and believe this will be an absolutely amazing experience for every one involved. This evenings meeting with Holy Trinity President, Timothy Bopp gave us the support and encouragement we need to continue trailblazing down the path we have embarked on. EYTT’s student application and interview process for the 2011-2012 program will begin next month, April, 2011.
Sorry about the dark picture. We have had a few gloriously sunny days, and as a result, I have forgotten what time of day is best for picture taking! Cloudy skies do have their advantages LOL! Will try to retake it later today. New picture is up!
I thought I'd be tired enough to collapse until morning.
- Cook quinoa package as per the directions on the box (generally 1.5 c Quinoa/ 2.5 c. water)
The kitset manufacturers would develop the architectural drawings, ensure that the buildings met code, and so on. They would also use their current process to develop building instructions to go with the kitset parts.
Some of the prices will leave you pale and in a state of shock. Those will be the more well known artists, the more accomplished artists, not necessarily the same thing you understand. The rest of the works are reasonably priced and I was impressed to note that most of the entries from non-household names were pretty much all sold.
Every so often, I just have to lay it out here as to how my life is going….it makes me feel genuine, not fake, not pretend. I know sometime when people get to know the real person behind a blog they leave, not wanting to know the way their life is now and then, I have found nothing but love and support when I have reached out to you my friends…and so I am reaching again…
As for his career future, he says he’ll finish the autobiography he’s writing and try to become a radio talk show host, a job he used to do back in his hometown of London, Ont.
Blushing again, he pulled himself off her as much as Sherim-wary prudence and her grip would allow. Still unable to see her, sight befuddled by the flapping of loose strings of Sherim, the task proved a challenge. Rel found he couldn't actually tell if he'd made the situation any better. Taslin wasn't letting go, either way.
Watching my teens and their friends tiptoe through the minefield of teenhood was enough of a reason for me to write about Bryn. I wanted to inspire my readers, to remind them that courage and strength is always inside you, and that no matter what life throws at you there is always a positive side to life. Above all I didn't want to write a dark book. I have plenty of dark manuscripts to share with readers in the future, but Dead Radiance wrote as a story with hope and courage and trust within its pages. I hope that after reading Dead Radiance readers go away with a great experience in Norse Mythology and a desire to learn more about this interesting lore. And secondly I hope that readers are inspired to have take a chance on themselves, to trust in their own strength and to have courage to pursue life to its fullest.
On a more positive note,remember my Fortean weekends in London & Newcastle over recent years ?[example:] ? Well! Bob & Me having been talking this week.It looks possible we are going to extend the Fortean-concept this year.Fairly likely that 6 of us blokes go in September to Transylvania ! Life Is Interesting!
Size of baby: 6 inches, 8.5 ounces, about the size of a mango
On to the topic at hand, Glee inspires less and less confidence in me by the week. When thinking of things to mention for “Dance with Somebody” I was sincerely hard pressed to really talk about anything! The episode was a very wooden tribute episode to Whitney Houston (we all knew it would come, as tributes seem to be what mash ups used to be on this show… dime a dozen) with two main points of plot one that was intriguing and one that was annoying. For starters we have Quinn who is struggling with her disability grow closer to Joe. It actually is a compelling subplot, however this is marginalized by the fact that Joe is a raging stereotype of conservative home schooled Christians who generally speaking, are never particularly well portrayed… his long hair frankly doesn’t help either, it is borderline obstreperous! It almost is a shame because Samuel Larsen is actually quite talented, and the character has a certain brooding that almost runs counter to the petulant naivety that is written for him. On the other hand, the episode features a lovers spat with everyone’s favorite gays Kurt and Blaine. Don’t get me wrong this isn’t another rant about Glee’s heavy handed pro-gay stance, this is yet another critique of their absolute inability to write good conflict. It seems as though the writers are absolutely paranoid of having any kind of conflict that can’t be superficially resolved through what seems to the viewer as nothing shy of deus ex machina. In Season 1 the conflict between Finn and Rachel that spawned when Finn said he wasn’t sure if he was ready to date Rachel, took the rest of the season to resolve. Similarly in Season 2 the drama between Finn and Quinn getting back together occurs over multiple episodes as well as the fight that Finn and Rachel got into when Finn discovered that Rachel forced herself on Puck. You simply don’t see this in the writing anymore, all issues get mopped up so that the show can have neat little happy endings that ultimately please no one! All that goes to say that the conflict between Kurt and Blaine was handled in an unrealistic way that was very frustrating because just when I began to think that the show had the balls to actually make a conflict mean something, they copped out.
Spread half the batter into the prepared pan. I dolloped it in in a few scoops and then gently evened it out with a rubber spatula. I didn't want the batter to rub the cinnamon-sugar off the sides of the pan. Sprinkle 1/3 to 1/2 cup of the remaining cinnamon-sugar evenly onto the batter. Top with the remaining batter and smooth it out. Finish by sprinkling on any remaining cinnamon-sugar. If you've run out, mix up 1/4 sugar with 1/2 teaspoon cinnamon.
Odyssey Storytelling creating connections ~ one story at a time
He came to see me after my shift... like 10:00 that night... and he holds my hand. (Only happened once before, and that was cuz he kept tickling me and I asked if I had to hold his hand to get him to stop. He said, yes. Smooth hubs, real smooth.) After a few minutes of talking about who the crap knows because all I can think about is him holding my hand, he asks, "So, does this mean yes?"
So, let's get down to it - all of the details you need for signing up are below...
away! Plus the unintentional hilarity is fantastic. But I digress. This now hugely famous love triangle isn’t one because at really no point does Bella ever seriously consider Jacob. Briefly in New Moon, when it looks like Edward’s gone forever, but hot damn, she literally jumps on a plane to fly halfway across the world the second she learns that’s still an option! Jacob, buddy, that should’ve been your first enormous clue that she was just not that into you.
THANK YOU, THANK YOU, THANK YOU to the wonderful person that recommended my blog and WELCOME to you new WW readers! The weight loss journey you are on is probably just one part of the BIGGER journey you are undertaking. Like me, you have taken an AWESOME step to lose weight by going to WW... and you can follow along here to take the next steps...
Today I am sharing a card with you that I made using Mint Motif's School Basics. Ironically today was the first day of preschool for my 4 year old. Strangely I thought I would be more enthusiastic about giving her a hug and leaving her in the safe hands of her teacher but I walked away with a lump in my throat and an overwhelming desire to keep her home with me one more year. I bet she has the best time but still that lump in my throat is still there..it may take me a little longer to get use to preschool than my daughter!
It took a lot of courage for me to finally cry uncle, since I had it in my head that to do so was the same as failing. I knew that I couldn’t do it all, but I felt like I should be able to anyway. When I finally realized that it was OK to ask for help or for changes to be made, it was a huge relief. The conversations with my bosses went much easier than I expected, and I came out of both meetings feeling much less stressed (and a bit more like a real adult.) I also learned that people may be willing to help you, but you have to be the one to ask for it (or conversely: help will always be given to those who ask for it**).
3. You must also have a very valid savings account.
Of course, there was more to Intute than records like that. Intute actually did quite a lot of good work, there were some good informative blog entries, there was the Virtual Training Suite, and Intute helped more than a few people find quality Internet resources. But the Internet resource catalogue was always unfortunately kept at the heart of Intute, and JISC money was poured into it.
All around were cute little woodland animal plushies.
flickr.com/photos/cphotography2010/sets/
Our brains are amazing. It is almost too much to comprehend when you begin thinking about the number of thought processes that can happen simultaneously. No wonder I had an accident. I am a deep thinker with a computer like brain! Don't I wish.
I bought the 2 items below.
I am trying very hard to keep this blog and weight4us.wordpress.com separate as far as topics go, but what I want to talk about tonight applies to my weightloss journey, and I would like to share it with you…
Kit Malthouse, deputy mayor for policing, said the ministry is refusing to back the plan because it is "not very good at coping with new ideas".
The remarks echo McNerney’s statement about a 757 replacement last May. Speaking to analysts at last year’s Boeing “investor day”, McNerney explained the company’s focus was on replacing the “heart” of the narrow-body market formed by the 737-700 and -800.
The cooking lesson began. The teacher told me to beat the eggs, then she gave me the recipe card and told me to follow the instructions. Being so young, I didn’t know how to read, but my shyness inhibited me from admitting this. For the whole class I just kept beating the eggs, until my teacher noticed and decided to ask, “Marunong ka ba magbasa?“ I said, “Hindi po.”
Looking for a great deal? The Old Farmhouse Gathering team is hosting an OFG 50 Club. Select items are listed at 50% the original price!!! Click on the banner above and check out some of the deals. Make sure you stop at the participants shops and click on the 50 Club section for other great deals!
So. My first half marathon in T minus 5 days. Excited!
Mason has been my baby for almost 14 years and is a well loved, well cared for indoor kitty. He used to go to the vet regularly until he was about 8...then I took him to a new vet that was closer to my house.
1) 15 minutes to establish a 1RM Snatch.
I didn't make them for myself. I made them for themselves.
13) Detroit Lions (via ARZ): S Mark Barron
The photos below give you some idea of the variety of the attractions, but for more photos go to
I made the crust with gluten-free graham cracker crumbs. There are boxed varieties that are fairly easy to find in the organic/natural food section of most grocery stores. And yes, they do taste like graham crackers and not some wonky substitute. They bake up wonderfully in pie shells like the one in this recipe and hold their crunch.
I want to write something about 2011,
At about the point, though, when we start to see Celine and Julie reacting to the events they individually experience at that mysterious house—as if they were audience members reacting to a movie they're watching—suddenly the movie started to snap into focus for me in ways that I began to find satisfying. And by the time Rivette gets to his amazing grand finale—Celine and Julie's attempt to rescue the girl from imminent doom in that house, an act that suggests two audience members entering into the entrancing fictional world that they've been wrapped up in for days—I had long given over to the film's sense of what-the-hell invention.
“It generally gives rise to an inquisitive smile and often to a more entertained reaction,” he says.
That fish made my evening. It was getting dark so I started casting my way back around to my pickup. I was still pretty excited about that fish, so I had to force myself to keep fishing slow. A friend once told me “If you think you’re fishing too slow . . . SLOW DOWN”. This second bass didn’t hit my popper all that hard, but it went straight down as well. This guy, however, didn’t stay down. This fish was about 2.5 pounds, and it took me 3-4 minutes to land him. Loads of fun on my 4 weight with 4 pound tippet. I’m Headed back just as soon as I can. I’m hoping for lots more popper action in the coming days.
Your world be shattered with nary a note
I don't want to overload you on the videos all at once, so today I'm giving you a break, but my third video of humiliation will be up Thursday. For those who don't know, Leigh Moore and I were doing a 30K in 30 days challenge, and if you missed a day, the penance was posting a Hacky Sack Club video. So that's what that's all about.
Look for natural leather satchel travelling bag, buckskin briefcases and leather satchels that have water-repellant characteristics. Several household leather totes get significant flap in addition to pouches and a few segments that happen to be squat turn. You must employ private opinion to decide which the very best will be. Hunt for sinuous gussets while in the household leather bags.
A Modern Day Parable
I am fortunate enough to have some wonderful friends who were more than happy to give their time, tips and share with me some souvenirs from their Kili climbing experience.
I have an uncle and six cousins in Australia. My uncle is my dad's brother and the resemblance is pretty striking. I've only met two of my cousins when they came over with their mum and dad in 1979 but I remember it like it was yesterday. The last time I saw my uncle was about four years ago when my nana passed away. If I had to leave the farm, there are two places I'd like to live; one is the Scottish Highlands where The Farmer, Amy and me have spent several wonderful breaks together and naturally holds fond memories for me. The other place is Australia. My uncle lives in Adelaide and even though I know virtually nothing about the place, I'd be interested to learn more. But something I did learn recently was how difficult it is to obtain a visa for a special needs child. They need to prove they can live independently yet I'm not sure if Amy ever will do. It brought it home to me how our special needs society are continuously fighting a battle, just to live the best they can.
There is so much inspiration out there in the www and I take delight in many little things from here, there and everywhere.
Rose M. Green – Indy 125 (20.16%)
So, this is what happened...
Today I thought I'd share some of my recent school day outfits with you all. Pretty casual... I'm all about easy '40s and '50s separates when it's book learnin' time. Also, I don't know if you've ever been to Vermont, but it is renowned for being cold and snowy, so one must dress accordingly. ("There's no such thing as bad weather, just bad clothing!", as people who are not me like to say.)
Realize that there are some things that just aren't worth worrying about and there are some things you just can't change. Don't waste time stressing over the things in either category.
“Shane, there's a little surprise coming over your way! That fucking Irish John has just been around here, bought me two rocks of white and left twenty five quid to get you three of choice and post over. And you ya little bastard, you never told me he 'ad AIDS! An I've been sharing my fuckin' crackpipe with 'im!”
We checked out of our hotel in London and took the train to the airport to pick up our rental car. Ryan was a little apprehensive when it came to renting a car, but after considering all of our options it was the most efficient way to see the sites. I was surprised that it only took Ryan a few minutes to acclimate to driving on the right side of the car and left side of the road. Anyway, our first stop was Canterbury Cathedral.
I hope you have been crafting some fun and spooky goodies!
Jesus returns from the desert and begins his ministry. He Crosses the Threshold when he comes out of the desert and crosses the Jordan into Galilee. Just stop to think how many people in the Bible crossed rivers. In Christianity, crossing a river is a symbol of baptism. When we are baptised, we cross a threshold from our old life to a new life.
Emery adds that it’s weird that, while so many leading British Columbians are coming out in favour of marijuana decriminalization, Premier Christy Clark still seems to be wavering on the issue.
I grew up with the Daily Mail. When I was younger and living with my parents, they read it every day. As I got older and began to form my own opinions, I decided I didn’t like it and instead opted for what I thought to be the more independent viewpoint of The Guardian. However, I didn’t actively oppose the Daily Mail. I had no opinion on it, other than it wasn’t for me.
1) gMusic - Allows you to listen to your entire Google Music collection and make any songs, albums or playlist available offline.
10. Everyone's a hero in their own way. "You, and you, and...mostly me, and you."
Adding: Now that the Ohio bridge plot can conveniently be connected to Occupy, despite the fact that it almost certainly could not have reached the level of a conspiracy without the generous assistance of the federal government, the usual suspects (FOX) will doubtless smear the entire movement.
Bridal Hair and Makeup Melbourne
Answer: When you spend more time spraying, dividing, and coddling them than with your family, job, and other hobbies combined. Have the Extension Service do a soil test. Are you trying to grow them in construction backfill or a swamp? And try the easy ones first. In Alaska that’s Trollius and Iris. Take a garden class at one of the nurseries. Pick a veteran gardener’s brain. Enroll in the Master Gardener course. Say it with me: “I can do it.”
out of sight, But then pop up again, eyes blinking bright.
2 cups fresh white bread crumbs
Nothing I have can I claim as my own—
Back in 2004, as a candidate for the US Senate, he said: “I’m a Christian. I do believe that tradition and my religious beliefs say that marriage is something sanctified between a man and a woman.” And this is the view he reiterated throughout his 2008 presidential campaign. Fair enough: he’s changed his mind. Unless you’re born with infallible theological insight, a reconsideration of some immature beliefs is inevitable as one matures: the milk is exchanged for meat. That is clearly the President’s latest view.
Finally, I was delighted to give a very informal talk about policing and mental health at the main mental health unit for my home county and very impressed at their biscuit collection. I was invited to do it after by a psychiatric nurse who used to be one of my PCs when I was a young ignorant sergeant. I spent two really very enjoyable hours giving a police perspective on supporting “psychiatric emergency” and “criminal suspects who are mentally ill”. (I usually divide general talks on this work into those two categories and cover: s136, s135, AWOLs and some other bits in the first section; prosecution, diversion and inpatient issues in the second. Loads of great questions and engagement and at the end a crisis team manager said, “My team love your blog.” Given it was originally written for police officers’ reference, those are warm words which make blogging in the evenings and in my own time very worthwhile indeed!
(50 cents per legitimate comment during April goes to Paralyzed Veterans of America.)
-You are obsessed with your grandpa.... obsessed
Anybody even remember what was big in the news at the start of last week? News happens so fast and furious in this place now it dizzying to keep up.
1) Conan The Barbarian Soundtrack:
JP was total charm, and even in the worst times, he would be the brightest light and could convince you that any situation is not as bad as you might think. He was a bit reckless, but he still stayed family, and precious family at that. If you loved life, you loved JP. JP was gay, and he was my brother and our family.
I used Sarah's teal in spray to create a background.I then stamped Sarah's cocktail and mitten stamp onto the background,cut,matted and layered with white cardstock and oodles of stickles. Cheers girlies! lol
And after all, isn't it only natural that the mountains are high while the rivers run low?
Leo Leo Leo- Never ever cared for him that much, in fact, pardon the pun but I never got on the Leo boat. I didn't really appreciate him until I saw him on Oprah touting flourescent lightbulbs and hybrid cars. You could just tell he really did care about something other than himself, which for women who care about other things other than what bra size their sportin', and where the next botox shot will go, this is like a pheromone. Throw in some tears from the Leo man, and it's all over for any standoffishness.
Count from one to ten with my eyes closed
GUNS!!
The California case is just one battleground in Apple and Samsung’s bruising legal war, which includes more than 20 cases in 10 countries as they jostle for the top spot in the smartphone and tablet markets.
4. County Fair Part 2
The addition is clearly Trinitarian, and support for the authenticity of the text is generally theological in nature rather than historical or textual.[1] On the basis of extant evidence, the most convincing being external, the vast weight of modern scholarship stands against the authenticity of the addition. This opposition is summarized by Bruce Metzger, “…these words are spurious and have no right to stand in the New Testament…”[2]
What if the characters are unlikeable/the plot doesn't make sense? This is where beta readers/critique partners are so important. If everyone hates the characters and tells you the plot doesn't make sense, you're going to need to reexamine what you're doing. That's the beauty of drafting stories, though: you can pinpoint what you're doing wrong or what you can do better. And again, there are so many things that are subjective. Some people don't like arrogant characters. Some don't like reluctant heroes, or whiny sidekicks, or damsels in distress. Some people love these. Write the characters as they're meant to be. Your character will grow through your story. Maybe a reader who hated a character in the beginning will love a character in the end. You won't know unless you write it and find out.
It's a terrible cycle. I know. But now that days have been nicer I feel more Pepped. More energetic. The kids will be able to play outside more and make less of a mess inside and I can have some much needed vitamin d. Winter killed me this year. Ha! Just you wait, there are some good posts coming. My van is crapping out on me, but hopefully I can get it looked at and have some much needed fun. Plus, a great adventure is in store for the Downie Girls here soon. Can't wait to post about that fun. Have a great night!
Last week I went on a much needed vacation to Sunny San Diego. I had a great time there with my family. While I was there me and my mom made an AMAZING Boston Cream Pie. My mom found this recipe after watching Throwdown with Bobby Flay.
Safety and Security Minister Charles Nqakula wrote in a letter to the Gun Dealers’ Association: “Licenses for firearms should not be granted to private individuals.” Similarly, his spokesperson Lesley Xinwa announced, “We are determined to cut down on the number of guns in the country.”
I haven't been able to resist a crafty flick through the latter pages, and have already stumbled on some real classics:-
Or at least, very different from what it seemed to be,
Wednesday-20 minute walk pushing Adeline
“It costs us a lot,” Brian said, his voice low, “If mistrust and tension fucks up our team chemistry, especially if we start fucking up in the field, because of it.”
Points will be given for the following:
April 10: Top Ten Books That Were Totally Deceiving (those covers or titles that don't fit the books, a book that was totally different than its summary, or those books you thought were going to be fluff that turned out to be more serious etc etc.)
If you speak French you'll love this YouTube video...
ROMNEY: I spent 25 years in business. If I had a business executive come to me and say they wanted to spend a few hundred billion dollars to put a colony on the moon, I’d say, “You’re fired.”
Sapper William Blanchard is one of the latest victims of the conflict.
House along with monetary preparing is better accomplished like a helpful enterprise between you, the attorney and your fiscal expert. (You will find financial experts who are in addition legal professionals, along with vice-versa). This will assist ensure your house along with purchase ideas have been in connect as well as in accordance along with related legal guidelines, while cheap swtor credits also assisting you to accomplish your own objectives along with care for the heirs.
1 small Johnny Gold apple, chopped
Daragh-Your navigating duties, wind and currents analysis were outstanding. You kept us in the current flow and maximum VMG to the mark. Now if those darn helmsmen wouldn't be chasing lifts and headers....
Written by Robert Suhosky
A single nation, they suggest, slowly emerged from the rivalries and fluctuating fortunes of separate kingdoms like Mercia, Wessex and East Anglia. Major figures such as Offa, Alfred, Edgar and Cnut are discussed in detail, while the stunning illustrations convey the immense achievements of Anglo-Saxon art and culture. Above all, the book shatters for ever the idea that the Anglo-Saxon centuries were simply a barbarous prelude to better things.
Neighbors who live on Southeast 32nd Avenue and Taylor Street in the Hawthorne neighborhood reported seeing several young adults throwing rocks into the windows of the Mars Hill Church early Tuesday Morning.
So yes, the world of my book contains a weapon of mass destruction and impending war. During the Iraq war the news media in the UK reported on ‘collateral damage’. It was no surprise to learn that the majority of those killed and injured were women and children. It’s always been the weakest in society – women, children and the elderly – who suffer most in wars. So an obvious question is: Can you be an effective politician in an imperfect world and remain a moral being? Windlass does bad things for what he believes are good reasons. Is he right? Are there levels of morality where shades of grey slide into black and when does that happen?
Stolen from Wikipedia.
But, as you’ll know if you follow the news, these are challenging times for young graduates seeking their first job. As a result, in some countries there has been a shift towards vocational degrees at the expense of purely academic degrees.
While it has been a joy to provide fresh baked goods to you for the past three-and-a-half years, our retail bakery business model is simply not sustainable, despite our countless loyal customers and the tireless dedication of my employees.
Balancing the nation's books I understand. Cutting unnecessary benefit spending I understand too. But don't target we disabled folk. I absolutely depend on the benefit I've been receiving since my whiplash incident. Without that weekly allowance, I CAN'T TURN MY HEAD FROM SIDE TO SIDE.
